PERSONS OF THE DIALOGUE: Socrates, Hermogenes, Cratylus.

HERMOGENES: Suppose that we make Socrates a party to the argument?

CRATYLUS: If you please.

HERMOGENES: I should explain to you, Socrates, that our friend Cratylus has
been arguing about names; he says that they are natural and not conventional;
not a portion of the human voice which men agree to use; but that there is a
truth or correctness in them, which is the same for Hellenes as for
barbarians. Whereupon I ask him, whether his own name of Cratylus is a true
name or not, and he answers 'Yes.' And Socrates? 'Yes.' Then every man's name,
as I tell him, is that which he is called. To this he replies--'If all the
world were to call you Hermogenes, that would not be your name.' And when I am
anxious to have a further explanation he is ironical and mysterious, and seems
to imply that he has a notion of his own about the matter, if he would only
tell, and could entirely convince me, if he chose to be intelligible. Tell me,
Socrates, what this oracle means; or rather tell me, if you will be so good,
what is your own view of the truth or correctness of names, which I would far
sooner hear.

SOCRATES: Son of Hipponicus, there is an ancient saying, that 'hard is the
knowledge of the good.' And the knowledge of names is a great part of
knowledge. If I had not been poor, I might have heard the fifty-drachma course
of the great Prodicus, which is a complete education in grammar and language--
these are his own words--and then I should have been at once able to answer
your question about the correctness of names. But, indeed, I have only heard
the single-drachma course, and therefore, I do not know the truth about such
matters; I will, however, gladly assist you and Cratylus in the investigation
of them. When he declares that your name is not really Hermogenes, I suspect
that he is only making fun of you;--he means to say that you are no true son
of Hermes, because you are always looking after a fortune and never in luck.
But, as I was saying, there is a good deal of difficulty in this sort of
knowledge, and therefore we had better leave the question open until we have
heard both sides.

HERMOGENES: I have often talked over this matter, both with Cratylus and
others, and cannot convince myself that there is any principle of correctness
in names other than convention and agreement; any name which you give, in my
opinion, is the right one, and if you change that and give another, the new
name is as correct as the old--we frequently change the names of our slaves,
and the newly-imposed name is as good as the old: for there is no name given
to anything by nature; all is convention and habit of the users;--such is my
view. But if I am mistaken I shall be happy to hear and learn of Cratylus, or
of any one else.

SOCRATES: I dare say that you may be right, Hermogenes: let us see;--Your
meaning is, that the name of each thing is only that which anybody agrees to
call it?

HERMOGENES: That is my notion.

SOCRATES: Whether the giver of the name be an individual or a city?

HERMOGENES: Yes.

SOCRATES: Well, now, let me take an instance;--suppose that I call a man a
horse or a horse a man, you mean to say that a man will be rightly called a
horse by me individually, and rightly called a man by the rest of the world;
and a horse again would be rightly called a man by me and a horse by the
world:--that is your meaning?

HERMOGENES: He would, according to my view.

SOCRATES: But how about truth, then? you would acknowledge that there is in
words a true and a false?

HERMOGENES: Certainly.

SOCRATES: And there are true and false propositions?

HERMOGENES: To be sure.

SOCRATES: And a true proposition says that which is, and a false proposition
says that which is not?

HERMOGENES: Yes; what other answer is possible?

SOCRATES: Then in a proposition there is a true and false?

HERMOGENES: Certainly.

SOCRATES: But is a proposition true as a whole only, and are the parts untrue?

HERMOGENES: No; the parts are true as well as the whole.

SOCRATES: Would you say the large parts and not the smaller ones, or every
part?

HERMOGENES: I should say that every part is true.

SOCRATES: Is a proposition resolvable into any part smaller than a name?

HERMOGENES: No; that is the smallest.

SOCRATES: Then the name is a part of the true proposition?

HERMOGENES: Yes.

SOCRATES: Yes, and a true part, as you say.

HERMOGENES: Yes.

SOCRATES: And is not the part of a falsehood also a falsehood?

HERMOGENES: Yes.

SOCRATES: Then, if propositions may be true and false, names may be true and
false?

HERMOGENES: So we must infer.

SOCRATES: And the name of anything is that which any one affirms to be the
name?

HERMOGENES: Yes.

SOCRATES: And will there be so many names of each thing as everybody says that
there are? and will they be true names at the time of uttering them?

HERMOGENES: Yes, Socrates, I can conceive no correctness of names other than
this; you give one name, and I another; and in different cities and countries
there are different names for the same things; Hellenes differ from barbarians
in their use of names, and the several Hellenic tribes from one another.

SOCRATES: But would you say, Hermogenes, that the things differ as the names
differ? and are they relative to individuals, as Protagoras tells us? For he
says that man is the measure of all things, and that things are to me as they
appear to me, and that they are to you as they appear to you. Do you agree
with him, or would you say that things have a permanent essence of their own?

HERMOGENES: There have been times, Socrates, when I have been driven in my
perplexity to take refuge with Protagoras; not that I agree with him at all.

SOCRATES: What! have you ever been driven to admit that there was no such
thing as a bad man?

HERMOGENES: No, indeed; but I have often had reason to think that there are
very bad men, and a good many of them.

SOCRATES: Well, and have you ever found any very good ones?

HERMOGENES: Not many.

SOCRATES: Still you have found them?

HERMOGENES: Yes.

SOCRATES: And would you hold that the very good were the very wise, and the
very evil very foolish? Would that be your view?

HERMOGENES: It would.

SOCRATES: But if Protagoras is right, and the truth is that things are as they
appear to any one, how can some of us be wise and some of us foolish?

HERMOGENES: Impossible.

SOCRATES: And if, on the other hand, wisdom and folly are really
distinguishable, you will allow, I think, that the assertion of Protagoras can
hardly be correct. For if what appears to each man is true to him, one man
cannot in reality be wiser than another.

HERMOGENES: He cannot.

SOCRATES: Nor will you be disposed to say with Euthydemus, that all things
equally belong to all men at the same moment and always; for neither on his
view can there be some good and others bad, if virtue and vice are always
equally to be attributed to all.

HERMOGENES: There cannot.

SOCRATES: But if neither is right, and things are not relative to individuals,
and all things do not equally belong to all at the same moment and always,
they must be supposed to have their own proper and permanent essence: they are
not in relation to us, or influenced by us, fluctuating according to our
fancy, but they are independent, and maintain to their own essence the
relation prescribed by nature.

HERMOGENES: I think, Socrates, that you have said the truth.

SOCRATES: Does what I am saying apply only to the things themselves, or
equally to the actions which proceed from them? Are not actions also a class
of being?

HERMOGENES: Yes, the actions are real as well as the things.

SOCRATES: Then the actions also are done according to their proper nature, and
not according to our opinion of them? In cutting, for example, we do not cut
as we please, and with any chance instrument; but we cut with the proper
instrument only, and according to the natural process of cutting; and the
natural process is right and will succeed, but any other will fail and be of
no use at all.

HERMOGENES: I should say that the natural way is the right way.

SOCRATES: Again, in burning, not every way is the right way; but the right way
is the natural way, and the right instrument the natural instrument.

HERMOGENES: True.

SOCRATES: And this holds good of all actions?

HERMOGENES: Yes.

SOCRATES: And speech is a kind of action?

HERMOGENES: True.

SOCRATES: And will a man speak correctly who speaks as he pleases? Will not
the successful speaker rather be he who speaks in the natural way of speaking,
and as things ought to be spoken, and with the natural instrument? Any other
mode of speaking will result in error and failure.

HERMOGENES: I quite agree with you.

SOCRATES: And is not naming a part of speaking? for in giving names men speak.

HERMOGENES: That is true.

SOCRATES: And if speaking is a sort of action and has a relation to acts, is
not naming also a sort of action?

HERMOGENES: True.

SOCRATES: And we saw that actions were not relative to ourselves, but had a
special nature of their own?

HERMOGENES: Precisely.

SOCRATES: Then the argument would lead us to infer that names ought to be
given according to a natural process, and with a proper instrument, and not at
our pleasure: in this and no other way shall we name with success.

HERMOGENES: I agree.

SOCRATES: But again, that which has to be cut has to be cut with something?

HERMOGENES: Yes.

SOCRATES: And that which has to be woven or pierced has to be woven or pierced
with something?

HERMOGENES: Certainly.

SOCRATES: And that which has to be named has to be named with something?

HERMOGENES: True.

SOCRATES: What is that with which we pierce?

HERMOGENES: An awl.

SOCRATES: And with which we weave?

HERMOGENES: A shuttle.

SOCRATES: And with which we name?

HERMOGENES: A name.

SOCRATES: Very good: then a name is an instrument?

HERMOGENES: Certainly.

SOCRATES: Suppose that I ask, 'What sort of instrument is a shuttle?' And you
answer, 'A weaving instrument.'

HERMOGENES: Well.

SOCRATES: And I ask again, 'What do we do when we weave?'--The answer is, that
we separate or disengage the warp from the woof.

HERMOGENES: Very true.

SOCRATES: And may not a similar description be given of an awl, and of
instruments in general?

HERMOGENES: To be sure.

SOCRATES: And now suppose that I ask a similar question about names: will you
answer me? Regarding the name as an instrument, what do we do when we name?

HERMOGENES: I cannot say.

SOCRATES: Do we not give information to one another, and distinguish things
according to their natures?

HERMOGENES: Certainly we do.

SOCRATES: Then a name is an instrument of teaching and of distinguishing
natures, as the shuttle is of distinguishing the threads of the web.

HERMOGENES: Yes.

SOCRATES: And the shuttle is the instrument of the weaver?

HERMOGENES: Assuredly.

SOCRATES: Then the weaver will use the shuttle well--and well means like a
weaver? and the teacher will use the name well--and well means like a teacher?

HERMOGENES: Yes.

SOCRATES: And when the weaver uses the shuttle, whose work will he be using
well?

HERMOGENES: That of the carpenter.

SOCRATES: And is every man a carpenter, or the skilled only?

HERMOGENES: Only the skilled.

SOCRATES: And when the piercer uses the awl, whose work will he be using well?

HERMOGENES: That of the smith.

SOCRATES: And is every man a smith, or only the skilled?

HERMOGENES: The skilled only.

SOCRATES: And when the teacher uses the name, whose work will he be using?

HERMOGENES: There again I am puzzled.

SOCRATES: Cannot you at least say who gives us the names which we use?

HERMOGENES: Indeed I cannot.

SOCRATES: Does not the law seem to you to give us them?

HERMOGENES: Yes, I suppose so.

SOCRATES: Then the teacher, when he gives us a name, uses the work of the
legislator?

HERMOGENES: I agree.

SOCRATES: And is every man a legislator, or the skilled only?

HERMOGENES: The skilled only.

SOCRATES: Then, Hermogenes, not every man is able to give a name, but only a
maker of names; and this is the legislator, who of all skilled artisans in the
world is the rarest.

HERMOGENES: True.

SOCRATES: And how does the legislator make names? and to what does he look?
Consider this in the light of the previous instances: to what does the
carpenter look in making the shuttle? Does he not look to that which is
naturally fitted to act as a shuttle?

HERMOGENES: Certainly.

SOCRATES: And suppose the shuttle to be broken in making, will he make
another, looking to the broken one? or will he look to the form according to
which he made the other?

HERMOGENES: To the latter, I should imagine.

SOCRATES: Might not that be justly called the true or ideal shuttle?

HERMOGENES: I think so.

SOCRATES: And whatever shuttles are wanted, for the manufacture of garments,
thin or thick, of flaxen, woollen, or other material, ought all of them to
have the true form of the shuttle; and whatever is the shuttle best adapted to
each kind of work, that ought to be the form which the maker produces in each
case.

HERMOGENES: Yes.

SOCRATES: And the same holds of other instruments: when a man has discovered
the instrument which is naturally adapted to each work, he must express this
natural form, and not others which he fancies, in the material, whatever it
may be, which he employs; for example, he ought to know how to put into iron
the forms of awls adapted by nature to their several uses?

HERMOGENES: Certainly.

SOCRATES: And how to put into wood forms of shuttles adapted by nature to
their uses?

HERMOGENES: True.

SOCRATES: For the several forms of shuttles naturally answer to the several
kinds of webs; and this is true of instruments in general.

HERMOGENES: Yes.

SOCRATES: Then, as to names: ought not our legislator also to know how to put
the true natural name of each thing into sounds and syllables, and to make and
give all names with a view to the ideal name, if he is to be a namer in any
true sense? And we must remember that different legislators will not use the
same syllables. For neither does every smith, although he may be making the
same instrument for the same purpose, make them all of the same iron. The form
must be the same, but the material may vary, and still the instrument may be
equally good of whatever iron made, whether in Hellas or in a foreign
country;--there is no difference.

HERMOGENES: Very true.

SOCRATES: And the legislator, whether he be Hellene or barbarian, is not
therefore to be deemed by you a worse legislator, provided he gives the true
and proper form of the name in whatever syllables; this or that country makes
no matter.

HERMOGENES: Quite true.

SOCRATES: But who then is to determine whether the proper form is given to the
shuttle, whatever sort of wood may be used? the carpenter who makes, or the
weaver who is to use them?

HERMOGENES: I should say, he who is to use them, Socrates.

SOCRATES: And who uses the work of the lyre-maker? Will not he be the man who
knows how to direct what is being done, and who will know also whether the
work is being well done or not?

HERMOGENES: Certainly.

SOCRATES: And who is he?

HERMOGENES: The player of the lyre.

SOCRATES: And who will direct the shipwright?

HERMOGENES: The pilot.

SOCRATES: And who will be best able to direct the legislator in his work, and
will know whether the work is well done, in this or any other country? Will
not the user be the man?

HERMOGENES: Yes.

SOCRATES: And this is he who knows how to ask questions?

HERMOGENES: Yes.

SOCRATES: And how to answer them?

HERMOGENES: Yes.

SOCRATES: And him who knows how to ask and answer you would call a
dialectician?

HERMOGENES: Yes; that would be his name.

SOCRATES: Then the work of the carpenter is to make a rudder, and the pilot
has to direct him, if the rudder is to be well made.

HERMOGENES: True.

SOCRATES: And the work of the legislator is to give names, and the
dialectician must be his director if the names are to be rightly given?

HERMOGENES: That is true.

SOCRATES: Then, Hermogenes, I should say that this giving of names can be no
such light matter as you fancy, or the work of light or chance persons; and
Cratylus is right in saying that things have names by nature, and that not
every man is an artificer of names, but he only who looks to the name which
each thing by nature has, and is able to express the true forms of things in
letters and syllables.

HERMOGENES: I cannot answer you, Socrates; but I find a difficulty in changing
my opinion all in a moment, and I think that I should be more readily
persuaded, if you would show me what this is which you term the natural
fitness of names.

SOCRATES: My good Hermogenes, I have none to show. Was I not telling you just
now , that I knew nothing, and proposing to share the
enquiry with you? But now that you and I have talked over the matter, a step
has been gained; for we have discovered that names have by nature a truth, and
that not every man knows how to give a thing a name.

HERMOGENES: Very good.

SOCRATES: And what is the nature of this truth or correctness of names? That,
if you care to know, is the next question.

HERMOGENES: Certainly, I care to know.

SOCRATES: Then reflect.

HERMOGENES: How shall I reflect?

SOCRATES: The true way is to have the assistance of those who know, and you
must pay them well both in money and in thanks; these are the Sophists, of
whom your brother, Callias, has--rather dearly--bought the reputation of
wisdom. But you have not yet come into your inheritance, and therefore you had
better go to him, and beg and entreat him to tell you what he has learnt from
Protagoras about the fitness of names.

HERMOGENES: But how inconsistent should I be, if, whilst repudiating
Protagoras and his truth 'Truth' was the title of the book of Protagoras;
compare Theaet., I were to attach any value to what he and his book affirm!

SOCRATES: Then if you despise him, you must learn of Homer and the poets.

HERMOGENES: And where does Homer say anything about names, and what does he
say?

SOCRATES: He often speaks of them; notably and nobly in the places where he
distinguishes the different names which Gods and men give to the same things.
Does he not in these passages make a remarkable statement about the
correctness of names? For the Gods must clearly be supposed to call things by
their right and natural names; do you not think so?

HERMOGENES: Why, of course they call them rightly, if they call them at all.
But to what are you referring?

SOCRATES: Do you not know what he says about the river in Troy who had a
single combat with Hephaestus?

'Whom,' as he says, 'the Gods call Xanthus, and men call Scamander.'

HERMOGENES: I remember.

SOCRATES: Well, and about this river--to know that he ought to be called
Xanthus and not Scamander--is not that a solemn lesson? Or about the bird
which, as he says,

'The Gods call Chalcis, and men Cymindis:'

to be taught how much more correct the name Chalcis is than the name Cymindis
--do you deem that a light matter? Or about Batieia and Myrina? Compare Il.
'The hill which men call Batieia and the immortals the tomb of the sportive
Myrina.' And there are many other observations of the same kind in Homer and
other poets. Now, I think that this is beyond the understanding of you and me;
but the names of Scamandrius and Astyanax, which he affirms to have been the
names of Hector's son, are more within the range of human faculties, as I am
disposed to think; and what the poet means by correctness may be more readily
apprehended in that instance: you will remember I dare say the lines to which
I refer? 

HERMOGENES: I do.

SOCRATES: Let me ask you, then, which did Homer think the more correct of the
names given to Hector's son--Astyanax or Scamandrius?

HERMOGENES: I do not know.

SOCRATES: How would you answer, if you were asked whether the wise or the
unwise are more likely to give correct names?

HERMOGENES: I should say the wise, of course.

SOCRATES: And are the men or the women of a city, taken as a class, the wiser?

HERMOGENES: I should say, the men.

SOCRATES: And Homer, as you know, says that the Trojan men called him Astyanax
; but if the men called him Astyanax, the other name of
Scamandrius could only have been given to him by the women.

HERMOGENES: That may be inferred.

SOCRATES: And must not Homer have imagined the Trojans to be wiser than their
wives?

HERMOGENES: To be sure.

SOCRATES: Then he must have thought Astyanax to be a more correct name for the
boy than Scamandrius?

HERMOGENES: Clearly.

SOCRATES: And what is the reason of this? Let us consider:--does he not
himself suggest a very good reason, when he says,

'For he alone defended their city and long walls'?

This appears to be a good reason for calling the son of the saviour king of
the city which his father was saving, as Homer observes.

HERMOGENES: I see.

SOCRATES: Why, Hermogenes, I do not as yet see myself; and do you?

HERMOGENES: No, indeed; not I.

SOCRATES: But tell me, friend, did not Homer himself also give Hector his
name?

HERMOGENES: What of that?

SOCRATES: The name appears to me to be very nearly the same as the name of
Astyanax--both are Hellenic; and a king  and a holder  have
nearly the same meaning, and are both descriptive of a king; for a man is
clearly the holder of that of which he is king; he rules, and owns, and holds
it. But, perhaps, you may think that I am talking nonsense; and indeed I
believe that I myself did not know what I meant when I imagined that I had
found some indication of the opinion of Homer about the correctness of names.

HERMOGENES: I assure you that I think otherwise, and I believe you to be on
the right track.

SOCRATES: There is reason, I think, in calling the lion's whelp a lion, and
the foal of a horse a horse; I am speaking only of the ordinary course of
nature, when an animal produces after his kind, and not of extraordinary
births;--if contrary to nature a horse have a calf, then I should not call
that a foal but a calf; nor do I call any inhuman birth a man, but only a
natural birth. And the same may be said of trees and other things. Do you
agree with me?

HERMOGENES: Yes, I agree.

SOCRATES: Very good. But you had better watch me and see that I do not play
tricks with you. For on the same principle the son of a king is to be called a
king. And whether the syllables of the name are the same or not the same,
makes no difference, provided the meaning is retained; nor does the addition
or subtraction of a letter make any difference so long as the essence of the
thing remains in possession of the name and appears in it.

HERMOGENES: What do you mean?

SOCRATES: A very simple matter. I may illustrate my meaning by the names of
letters, which you know are not the same as the letters themselves with the
exception of the four epsilon, upsilon, omicron, omega; the names of the rest,
whether vowels or consonants, are made up of other letters which we add to
them; but so long as we introduce the meaning, and there can be no mistake,
the name of the letter is quite correct. Take, for example, the letter beta--
the addition of eta, tau, alpha, gives no offence, and does not prevent the
whole name from having the value which the legislator intended--so well did he
know how to give the letters names.

HERMOGENES: I believe you are right.

SOCRATES: And may not the same be said of a king? a king will often be the son
of a king, the good son or the noble son of a good or noble sire; and
similarly the offspring of every kind, in the regular course of nature, is
like the parent, and therefore has the same name. Yet the syllables may be
disguised until they appear different to the ignorant person, and he may not
recognize them, although they are the same, just as any one of us would not
recognize the same drugs under different disguises of colour and smell,
although to the physician, who regards the power of them, they are the same,
and he is not put out by the addition; and in like manner the etymologist is
not put out by the addition or transposition or subtraction of a letter or
two, or indeed by the change of all the letters, for this need not interfere
with the meaning. As was just now said, the names of Hector and Astyanax have
only one letter alike, which is tau, and yet they have the same meaning. And
how little in common with the letters of their names has Archepolis ruler of
the city--and yet the meaning is the same. And there are many other names
which just mean 'king.' Again, there are several names for a general, as, for
example, Agis  and Polemarchus  and Eupolemus good
warrior; and others which denote a physician, as Iatrocles 
and Acesimbrotus ; and there are many others which might be
cited, differing in their syllables and letters, but having the same meaning.
Would you not say so?

HERMOGENES: Yes.

SOCRATES: The same names, then, ought to be assigned to those who follow in
the course of nature?

HERMOGENES: Yes.

SOCRATES: And what of those who follow out of the course of nature, and are
prodigies? for example, when a good and religious man has an irreligious son,
he ought to bear the name not of his father, but of the class to which he
belongs, just as in the case which was before supposed of a horse foaling a
calf.

HERMOGENES: Quite true.

SOCRATES: Then the irreligious son of a religious father should be called
irreligious?

HERMOGENES: Certainly.

SOCRATES: He should not be called Theophilus  or Mnesitheus
, or any of these names: if names are correctly given, his
should have an opposite meaning.

HERMOGENES: Certainly, Socrates.

SOCRATES: Again, Hermogenes, there is Orestes  who
appears to be rightly called; whether chance gave the name, or perhaps some
poet who meant to express the brutality and fierceness and mountain wildness
of his hero's nature.

HERMOGENES: That is very likely, Socrates.

SOCRATES: And his father's name is also according to nature.

HERMOGENES: Clearly.

SOCRATES: Yes, for as his name, so also is his nature; Agamemnon admirable
for remaining is one who is patient and persevering in the accomplishment of
his resolves, and by his virtue crowns them; and his continuance at Troy with
all the vast army is a proof of that admirable endurance in him which is
signified by the name Agamemnon. I also think that Atreus is rightly called;
for his murder of Chrysippus and his exceeding cruelty to Thyestes are
damaging and destructive to his reputation--the name is a little altered and
disguised so as not to be intelligible to every one, but to the etymologist
there is no difficulty in seeing the meaning, for whether you think of him as
ateires the stubborn, or as atrestos the fearless, or as ateros the
destructive one, the name is perfectly correct in every point of view. And I
think that Pelops is also named appropriately; for, as the name implies, he is
rightly called Pelops who sees what is near only .

HERMOGENES: How so?

SOCRATES: Because, according to the tradition, he had no forethought or
foresight of all the evil which the murder of Myrtilus would entail upon his
whole race in remote ages; he saw only what was at hand and immediate,--or in
other words, pelas , in his eagerness to win Hippodamia by all means for
his bride. Every one would agree that the name of Tantalus is rightly given
and in accordance with nature, if the traditions about him are true.

HERMOGENES: And what are the traditions?

SOCRATES: Many terrible misfortunes are said to have happened to him in his
life--last of all, came the utter ruin of his country; and after his death he
had the stone suspended  over his head in the world below--all this
agrees wonderfully well with his name. You might imagine that some person who
wanted to call him Talantatos ,
disguised the name by altering it into Tantalus; and into this form, by some
accident of tradition, it has actually been transmuted. The name of Zeus, who
is his alleged father, has also an excellent meaning, although hard to be
understood, because really like a sentence, which is divided into two parts,
for some call him Zena, and use the one half, and others who use the other
half call him Dia; the two together signify the nature of the God, and the
business of a name, as we were saying, is to express the nature. For there is
none who is more the author of life to us and to all, than the lord and king
of all. Wherefore we are right in calling him Zena and Dia, which are one
name, although divided, meaning the God through whom all creatures always have
life . There is an irreverence, at
first sight, in calling him son of Cronos ,
and we might rather expect Zeus to be the child of a mighty intellect. Which
is the fact; for this is the meaning of his father's name: Kronos quasi Koros
, not in the sense of a youth, but signifying to chatharon
chai acheraton tou nou, the pure and garnished mind . He,
as we are informed by tradition, was begotten of Uranus, rightly so called
 from looking upwards; which, as philosophers tell us, is
the way to have a pure mind, and the name Uranus is therefore correct. If I
could remember the genealogy of Hesiod, I would have gone on and tried more
conclusions of the same sort on the remoter ancestors of the Gods,--then I
might have seen whether this wisdom, which has come to me all in an instant, I
know not whence, will or will not hold good to the end.

HERMOGENES: You seem to me, Socrates, to be quite like a prophet newly
inspired, and to be uttering oracles.

SOCRATES: Yes, Hermogenes, and I believe that I caught the inspiration from
the great Euthyphro of the Prospaltian deme, who gave me a long lecture which
commenced at dawn: he talked and I listened, and his wisdom and enchanting
ravishment has not only filled my ears but taken possession of my soul, and
to-day I shall let his superhuman power work and finish the investigation of
names--that will be the way; but to-morrow, if you are so disposed, we will
conjure him away, and make a purgation of him, if we can only find some priest
or sophist who is skilled in purifications of this sort.

HERMOGENES: With all my heart; for am very curious to hear the rest of the
enquiry about names.

SOCRATES: Then let us proceed; and where would you have us begin, now that we
have got a sort of outline of the enquiry? Are there any names which witness
of themselves that they are not given arbitrarily, but have a natural fitness?
The names of heroes and of men in general are apt to be deceptive because they
are often called after ancestors with whose names, as we were saying, they may
have no business; or they are the expression of a wish like Eutychides the
son of good fortune, or Sosias , or Theophilus the beloved of
God, and others. But I think that we had better leave these, for there will
be more chance of finding correctness in the names of immutable
essences;--there ought to have been more care taken about them when they were
named, and perhaps there may have been some more than human power at work
occasionally in giving them names.

HERMOGENES: I think so, Socrates.

SOCRATES: Ought we not to begin with the consideration of the Gods, and show
that they are rightly named Gods?

HERMOGENES: Yes, that will be well.

SOCRATES: My notion would be something of this sort:--I suspect that the sun,
moon, earth, stars, and heaven, which are still the Gods of many barbarians,
were the only Gods known to the aboriginal Hellenes. Seeing that they were
always moving and running, from their running nature they were called Gods or
runners ; and when men became acquainted with the other
Gods, they proceeded to apply the same name to them all. Do you think that
likely?

HERMOGENES: I think it very likely indeed.

SOCRATES: What shall follow the Gods?

HERMOGENES: Must not demons and heroes and men come next?

SOCRATES: Demons! And what do you consider to be the meaning of this word?
Tell me if my view is right.

HERMOGENES: Let me hear.

SOCRATES: You know how Hesiod uses the word?

HERMOGENES: I do not.

SOCRATES: Do you not remember that he speaks of a golden race of men who came
first?

HERMOGENES: Yes, I do.

SOCRATES: He says of them--

'But now that fate has closed over this race They are holy demons upon the
earth, Beneficent, averters of ills, guardians of mortal men.' Hesiod, Works
and Days.

HERMOGENES: What is the inference?

SOCRATES: What is the inference! Why, I suppose that he means by the golden
men, not men literally made of gold, but good and noble; and I am convinced of
this, because he further says that we are the iron race.

HERMOGENES: That is true.

SOCRATES: And do you not suppose that good men of our own day would by him be
said to be of golden race?

HERMOGENES: Very likely.

SOCRATES: And are not the good wise?

HERMOGENES: Yes, they are wise.

SOCRATES: And therefore I have the most entire conviction that he called them
demons, because they were daemones , and in our older Attic
dialect the word itself occurs. Now he and other poets say truly, that when a
good man dies he has honour and a mighty portion among the dead, and becomes a
demon; which is a name given to him signifying wisdom. And I say too, that
every wise man who happens to be a good man is more than human 
both in life and death, and is rightly called a demon.

HERMOGENES: Then I rather think that I am of one mind with you; but what is
the meaning of the word 'hero'? Eros with an eta, in the old writing eros
with an epsilon.

SOCRATES: I think that there is no difficulty in explaining, for the name is
not much altered, and signifies that they were born of love.

HERMOGENES: What do you mean?

SOCRATES: Do you not know that the heroes are demigods?

HERMOGENES: What then?

SOCRATES: All of them sprang either from the love of a God for a mortal woman,
or of a mortal man for a Goddess; think of the word in the old Attic, and you
will see better that the name heros is only a slight alteration of Eros, from
whom the heroes sprang: either this is the meaning, or, if not this, then they
must have been skilful as rhetoricians and dialecticians, and able to put the
question , for eirein is equivalent to legein. And therefore, as I was
saying, in the Attic dialect the heroes turn out to be rhetoricians and
questioners. All this is easy enough; the noble breed of heroes are a tribe of
sophists and rhetors. But can you tell me why men are called anthropoi?--that
is more difficult.

HERMOGENES: No, I cannot; and I would not try even if I could, because I think
that you are the more likely to succeed.

SOCRATES: That is to say, you trust to the inspiration of Euthyphro.

HERMOGENES: Of course.

SOCRATES: Your faith is not vain; for at this very moment a new and ingenious
thought strikes me, and, if I am not careful, before to-morrow's dawn I shall
be wiser than I ought to be. Now, attend to me; and first, remember that we
often put in and pull out letters in words, and give names as we please and
change the accents. Take, for example, the word Dii Philos; in order to
convert this from a sentence into a noun, we omit one of the iotas and sound
the middle syllable grave instead of acute; as, on the other hand, letters are
sometimes inserted in words instead of being omitted, and the acute takes the
place of the grave.

HERMOGENES: That is true.

SOCRATES: The name anthropos, which was once a sentence, and is now a noun,
appears to be a case just of this sort, for one letter, which is the alpha,
has been omitted, and the acute on the last syllable has been changed to a
grave.

HERMOGENES: What do you mean?

SOCRATES: I mean to say that the word 'man' implies that other animals never
examine, or consider, or look up at what they see, but that man not only sees
 but considers and looks up at that which he sees, and hence he alone
of all animals is rightly anthropos, meaning anathron a opopen.

HERMOGENES: May I ask you to examine another word about which I am curious?

SOCRATES: Certainly.

HERMOGENES: I will take that which appears to me to follow next in order. You
know the distinction of soul and body?

SOCRATES: Of course.

HERMOGENES: Let us endeavour to analyze them like the previous words.

SOCRATES: You want me first of all to examine the natural fitness of the word
psuche , and then of the word soma ?

HERMOGENES: Yes.

SOCRATES: If I am to say what occurs to me at the moment, I should imagine
that those who first used the name psuche meant to express that the soul when
in the body is the source of life, and gives the power of breath and revival
, and when this reviving power fails then the body perishes and
dies, and this, if I am not mistaken, they called psyche. But please stay a
moment; I fancy that I can discover something which will be more acceptable to
the disciples of Euthyphro, for I am afraid that they will scorn this
explanation. What do you say to another?

HERMOGENES: Let me hear.

SOCRATES: What is that which holds and carries and gives life and motion to
the entire nature of the body? What else but the soul?

HERMOGENES: Just that.

SOCRATES: And do you not believe with Anaxagoras, that mind or soul is the
ordering and containing principle of all things?

HERMOGENES: Yes; I do.

SOCRATES: Then you may well call that power phuseche which carries and holds
nature , and this may be refined away into psuche.

HERMOGENES: Certainly; and this derivation is, I think, more scientific than
the other.

SOCRATES: It is so; but I cannot help laughing, if I am to suppose that this
was the true meaning of the name.

HERMOGENES: But what shall we say of the next word?

SOCRATES: You mean soma .

HERMOGENES: Yes.

SOCRATES: That may be variously interpreted; and yet more variously if a
little permutation is allowed. For some say that the body is the grave 
of the soul which may be thought to be buried in our present life; or again
the index of the soul, because the soul gives indications to  the
body; probably the Orphic poets were the inventors of the name, and they were
under the impression that the soul is suffering the punishment of sin, and
that the body is an enclosure or prison in which the soul is incarcerated,
kept safe , as the name soma implies, until the penalty is
paid; according to this view, not even a letter of the word need be changed.

HERMOGENES: I think, Socrates, that we have said enough of this class of
words. But have we any more explanations of the names of the Gods, like that
which you were giving of Zeus? I should like to know whether any similar
principle of correctness is to be applied to them.

SOCRATES: Yes, indeed, Hermogenes; and there is one excellent principle which,
as men of sense, we must acknowledge,--that of the Gods we know nothing,
either of their natures or of the names which they give themselves; but we are
sure that the names by which they call themselves, whatever they may be, are
true. And this is the best of all principles; and the next best is to say, as
in prayers, that we will call them by any sort or kind of names or patronymics
which they like, because we do not know of any other. That also, I think, is a
very good custom, and one which I should much wish to observe. Let us, then,
if you please, in the first place announce to them that we are not enquiring
about them; we do not presume that we are able to do so; but we are enquiring
about the meaning of men in giving them these names,--in this there can be
small blame.

HERMOGENES: I think, Socrates, that you are quite right, and I would like to
do as you say.

SOCRATES: Shall we begin, then, with Hestia, according to custom?

HERMOGENES: Yes, that will be very proper.

SOCRATES: What may we suppose him to have meant who gave the name Hestia?

HERMOGENES: That is another and certainly a most difficult question.

SOCRATES: My dear Hermogenes, the first imposers of names must surely have
been considerable persons; they were philosophers, and had a good deal to say.

HERMOGENES: Well, and what of them?

SOCRATES: They are the men to whom I should attribute the imposition of names.
Even in foreign names, if you analyze them, a meaning is still discernible.
For example, that which we term ousia is by some called esia, and by others
again osia. Now that the essence of things should be called estia, which is
akin to the first of these , is rational enough. And there is
reason in the Athenians calling that estia which participates in ousia. For in
ancient times we too seem to have said esia for ousia, and this you may note
to have been the idea of those who appointed that sacrifices should be first
offered to estia, which was natural enough if they meant that estia was the
essence of things. Those again who read osia seem to have inclined to the
opinion of Heracleitus, that all things flow and nothing stands; with them the
pushing principle  is the cause and ruling power of all things, and is
therefore rightly called osia. Enough of this, which is all that we who know
nothing can affirm. Next in order after Hestia we ought to consider Rhea and
Cronos, although the name of Cronos has been already discussed. But I dare say
that I am talking great nonsense.

HERMOGENES: Why, Socrates?

SOCRATES: My good friend, I have discovered a hive of wisdom.

HERMOGENES: Of what nature?

SOCRATES: Well, rather ridiculous, and yet plausible.

HERMOGENES: How plausible?

SOCRATES: I fancy to myself Heracleitus repeating wise traditions of antiquity
as old as the days of Cronos and Rhea, and of which Homer also spoke.

HERMOGENES: How do you mean?

SOCRATES: Heracleitus is supposed to say that all things are in motion and
nothing at rest; he compares them to the stream of a river, and says that you
cannot go into the same water twice.

HERMOGENES: That is true.

SOCRATES: Well, then, how can we avoid inferring that he who gave the names of
Cronos and Rhea to the ancestors of the Gods, agreed pretty much in the
doctrine of Heracleitus? Is the giving of the names of streams to both of them
purely accidental? Compare the line in which Homer, and, as I believe, Hesiod
also, tells of

'Ocean, the origin of Gods, and mother Tethys Il.--the line is not found in
the extant works of Hesiod..'

And again, Orpheus says, that

'The fair river of Ocean was the first to marry, and he espoused his sister
Tethys, who was his mother's daughter.'

You see that this is a remarkable coincidence, and all in the direction of
Heracleitus.

HERMOGENES: I think that there is something in what you say, Socrates; but I
do not understand the meaning of the name Tethys.

SOCRATES: Well, that is almost self-explained, being only the name of a
spring, a little disguised; for that which is strained and filtered
 may be likened to a spring, and the name Tethys is
made up of these two words.

HERMOGENES: The idea is ingenious, Socrates.

SOCRATES: To be sure. But what comes next?--of Zeus we have spoken.

HERMOGENES: Yes.

SOCRATES: Then let us next take his two brothers, Poseidon and Pluto, whether
the latter is called by that or by his other name.

HERMOGENES: By all means.

SOCRATES: Poseidon is Posidesmos, the chain of the feet; the original inventor
of the name had been stopped by the watery element in his walks, and not
allowed to go on, and therefore he called the ruler of this element Poseidon;
the epsilon was probably inserted as an ornament. Yet, perhaps, not so; but
the name may have been originally written with a double lamda and not with a
sigma, meaning that the God knew many things . And perhaps also
he being the shaker of the earth, has been named from shaking , and
then pi and delta have been added. Pluto gives wealth , and his name
means the giver of wealth, which comes out of the earth beneath. People in
general appear to imagine that the term Hades is connected with the invisible
 and so they are led by their fears to call the God Pluto instead.

HERMOGENES: And what is the true derivation?

SOCRATES: In spite of the mistakes which are made about the power of this
deity, and the foolish fears which people have of him, such as the fear of
always being with him after death, and of the soul denuded of the body going
to him , my belief is that all is quite consistent, and that the
office and name of the God really correspond.

HERMOGENES: Why, how is that?

SOCRATES: I will tell you my own opinion; but first, I should like to ask you
which chain does any animal feel to be the stronger? and which confines him
more to the same spot,--desire or necessity?

HERMOGENES: Desire, Socrates, is stronger far.

SOCRATES: And do you not think that many a one would escape from Hades, if he
did not bind those who depart to him by the strongest of chains?

HERMOGENES: Assuredly they would.

SOCRATES: And if by the greatest of chains, then by some desire, as I should
certainly infer, and not by necessity?

HERMOGENES: That is clear.

SOCRATES: And there are many desires?

HERMOGENES: Yes.

SOCRATES: And therefore by the greatest desire, if the chain is to be the
greatest?

HERMOGENES: Yes.

SOCRATES: And is any desire stronger than the thought that you will be made
better by associating with another?

HERMOGENES: Certainly not.

SOCRATES: And is not that the reason, Hermogenes, why no one, who has been to
him, is willing to come back to us? Even the Sirens, like all the rest of the
world, have been laid under his spells. Such a charm, as I imagine, is the God
able to infuse into his words. And, according to this view, he is the perfect
and accomplished Sophist, and the great benefactor of the inhabitants of the
other world; and even to us who are upon earth he sends from below exceeding
blessings. For he has much more than he wants down there; wherefore he is
called Pluto . Note also, that he will have nothing to do with
men while they are in the body, but only when the soul is liberated from the
desires and evils of the body. Now there is a great deal of philosophy and
reflection in that; for in their liberated state he can bind them with the
desire of virtue, but while they are flustered and maddened by the body, not
even father Cronos himself would suffice to keep them with him in his own far-
famed chains.

HERMOGENES: There is a deal of truth in what you say.

SOCRATES: Yes, Hermogenes, and the legislator called him Hades, not from the
unseen --far otherwise, but from his knowledge  of all noble
things.

HERMOGENES: Very good; and what do we say of Demeter, and Here, and Apollo,
and Athene, and Hephaestus, and Ares, and the other deities?

SOCRATES: Demeter is e didousa meter, who gives food like a mother; Here is
the lovely one --for Zeus, according to tradition, loved and married
her; possibly also the name may have been given when the legislator was
thinking of the heavens, and may be only a disguise of the air , putting
the end in the place of the beginning. You will recognize the truth of this if
you repeat the letters of Here several times over. People dread the name of
Pherephatta as they dread the name of Apollo,--and with as little reason; the
fear, if I am not mistaken, only arises from their ignorance of the nature of
names. But they go changing the name into Phersephone, and they are terrified
at this; whereas the new name means only that the Goddess is wise ; for
seeing that all things in the world are in motion , that principle
which embraces and touches and is able to follow them, is wisdom. And
therefore the Goddess may be truly called Pherepaphe , or some
name like it, because she touches that which is in motion tou pheromenon
ephaptomene, herein showing her wisdom. And Hades, who is wise, consorts with
her, because she is wise. They alter her name into Pherephatta now-a-days,
because the present generation care for euphony more than truth. There is the
other name, Apollo, which, as I was saying, is generally supposed to have some
terrible signification. Have you remarked this fact?

HERMOGENES: To be sure I have, and what you say is true.

SOCRATES: But the name, in my opinion, is really most expressive of the power
of the God.

HERMOGENES: How so?

SOCRATES: I will endeavour to explain, for I do not believe that any single
name could have been better adapted to express the attributes of the God,
embracing and in a manner signifying all four of them,--music, and prophecy,
and medicine, and archery.

HERMOGENES: That must be a strange name, and I should like to hear the
explanation.

SOCRATES: Say rather an harmonious name, as beseems the God of Harmony. In the
first place, the purgations and purifications which doctors and diviners use,
and their fumigations with drugs magical or medicinal, as well as their
washings and lustral sprinklings, have all one and the same object, which is
to make a man pure both in body and soul.

HERMOGENES: Very true.

SOCRATES: And is not Apollo the purifier, and the washer, and the absolver
from all impurities?

HERMOGENES: Very true.

SOCRATES: Then in reference to his ablutions and absolutions, as being the
physician who orders them, he may be rightly called Apolouon ; or in
respect of his powers of divination, and his truth and sincerity, which is the
same as truth, he may be most fitly called Aplos, from aplous , as in
the Thessalian dialect, for all the Thessalians call him Aplos; also he is aei
Ballon , because he is a master archer who never misses; or
again, the name may refer to his musical attributes, and then, as in
akolouthos, and akoitis, and in many other words the alpha is supposed to mean
'together,' so the meaning of the name Apollo will be 'moving together,'
whether in the poles of heaven as they are called, or in the harmony of song,
which is termed concord, because he moves all together by an harmonious power,
as astronomers and musicians ingeniously declare. And he is the God who
presides over harmony, and makes all things move together, both among Gods and
among men. And as in the words akolouthos and akoitis the alpha is substituted
for an omicron, so the name Apollon is equivalent to omopolon; only the second
lambda is added in order to avoid the ill-omened sound of destruction
. Now the suspicion of this destructive power still haunts the minds
of some who do not consider the true value of the name, which, as I was saying
just now, has reference to all the powers of the God, who is the single one,
the everdarting, the purifier, the mover together aplous, aei Ballon,
apolouon, omopolon. The name of the Muses and of music would seem to be
derived from their making philosophical enquiries ; and Leto is
called by this name, because she is such a gentle Goddess, and so willing
 to grant our requests; or her name may be Letho, as she is often
called by strangers--they seem to imply by it her amiability, and her smooth
and easy-going way of behaving. Artemis is named from her healthy ,
well-ordered nature, and because of her love of virginity, perhaps because she
is a proficient in virtue , and perhaps also as hating intercourse of
the sexes . He who gave the Goddess her name may have had
any or all of these reasons.

HERMOGENES: What is the meaning of Dionysus and Aphrodite?

SOCRATES: Son of Hipponicus, you ask a solemn question; there is a serious and
also a facetious explanation of both these names; the serious explanation is
not to be had from me, but there is no objection to your hearing the facetious
one; for the Gods too love a joke. Dionusos is simply didous oinon giver of
wine, Didoinusos, as he might be called in fun,--and oinos is properly
oionous, because wine makes those who drink, think  that they have a
mind  when they have none. The derivation of Aphrodite, born of the foam
, may be fairly accepted on the authority of Hesiod.

HERMOGENES: Still there remains Athene, whom you, Socrates, as an Athenian,
will surely not forget; there are also Hephaestus and Ares.

SOCRATES: I am not likely to forget them.

HERMOGENES: No, indeed.

SOCRATES: There is no difficulty in explaining the other appellation of
Athene.

HERMOGENES: What other appellation?

SOCRATES: We call her Pallas.

HERMOGENES: To be sure.

SOCRATES: And we cannot be wrong in supposing that this is derived from armed
dances. For the elevation of oneself or anything else above the earth, or by
the use of the hands, we call shaking , or dancing.

HERMOGENES: That is quite true.

SOCRATES: Then that is the explanation of the name Pallas?

HERMOGENES: Yes; but what do you say of the other name?

SOCRATES: Athene?

HERMOGENES: Yes.

SOCRATES: That is a graver matter, and there, my friend, the modern
interpreters of Homer may, I think, assist in explaining the view of the
ancients. For most of these in their explanations of the poet, assert that he
meant by Athene 'mind'  and 'intelligence' , and the maker of
names appears to have had a singular notion about her; and indeed calls her by
a still higher title, 'divine intelligence' , as though he would
say: This is she who has the mind of God ;--using alpha as a
dialectical variety for eta, and taking away iota and sigma There seems to be
some error in the MSS. The meaning is that the word theonoa = theounoa is a
curtailed form of theou noesis, but the omitted letters do not agree..
Perhaps, however, the name Theonoe may mean 'she who knows divine things'
 better than others. Nor shall we be far wrong in supposing that
the author of it wished to identify this Goddess with moral intelligence en
ethei noesin, and therefore gave her the name ethonoe; which, however, either
he or his successors have altered into what they thought a nicer form, and
called her Athene.

HERMOGENES: But what do you say of Hephaestus?

SOCRATES: Speak you of the princely lord of light ?

HERMOGENES: Surely.

SOCRATES: Ephaistos is Phaistos, and has added the eta by attraction; that is
obvious to anybody.

HERMOGENES: That is very probable, until some more probable notion gets into
your head.

SOCRATES: To prevent that, you had better ask what is the derivation of Ares.

HERMOGENES: What is Ares?

SOCRATES: Ares may be called, if you will, from his manhood  and
manliness, or if you please, from his hard and unchangeable nature, which is
the meaning of arratos: the latter is a derivation in every way appropriate to
the God of war.

HERMOGENES: Very true.

SOCRATES: And now, by the Gods, let us have no more of the Gods, for I am
afraid of them; ask about anything but them, and thou shalt see how the steeds
of Euthyphro can prance.

HERMOGENES: Only one more God! I should like to know about Hermes, of whom I
am said not to be a true son. Let us make him out, and then I shall know
whether there is any meaning in what Cratylus says.

SOCRATES: I should imagine that the name Hermes has to do with speech, and
signifies that he is the interpreter , or messenger, or thief, or
liar, or bargainer; all that sort of thing has a great deal to do with
language; as I was telling you, the word eirein is expressive of the use of
speech, and there is an often-recurring Homeric word emesato, which means 'he
contrived'--out of these two words, eirein and mesasthai, the legislator
formed the name of the God who invented language and speech; and we may
imagine him dictating to us the use of this name: 'O my friends,' says he to
us, 'seeing that he is the contriver of tales or speeches, you may rightly
call him Eirhemes.' And this has been improved by us, as we think, into
Hermes. Iris also appears to have been called from the verb 'to tell'
, because she was a messenger.

HERMOGENES: Then I am very sure that Cratylus was quite right in saying that I
was no true son of Hermes , for I am not a good hand at speeches.

SOCRATES: There is also reason, my friend, in Pan being the double-formed son
of Hermes.

HERMOGENES: How do you make that out?

SOCRATES: You are aware that speech signifies all things , and is always
turning them round and round, and has two forms, true and false?

HERMOGENES: Certainly.

SOCRATES: Is not the truth that is in him the smooth or sacred form which
dwells above among the Gods, whereas falsehood dwells among men below, and is
rough like the goat of tragedy; for tales and falsehoods have generally to do
with the tragic or goatish life, and tragedy is the place of them?

HERMOGENES: Very true.

SOCRATES: Then surely Pan, who is the declarer of all things  and the
perpetual mover  of all things, is rightly called aipolos goat-
herd, he being the two-formed son of Hermes, smooth in his upper part, and
rough and goatlike in his lower regions. And, as the son of Hermes, he is
speech or the brother of speech, and that brother should be like brother is no
marvel. But, as I was saying, my dear Hermogenes, let us get away from the
Gods.

HERMOGENES: From these sort of Gods, by all means, Socrates. But why should we
not discuss another kind of Gods--the sun, moon, stars, earth, aether, air,
fire, water, the seasons, and the year?

SOCRATES: You impose a great many tasks upon me. Still, if you wish, I will
not refuse.

HERMOGENES: You will oblige me.

SOCRATES: How would you have me begin? Shall I take first of all him whom you
mentioned first--the sun?

HERMOGENES: Very good.

SOCRATES: The origin of the sun will probably be clearer in the Doric form,
for the Dorians call him alios, and this name is given to him because when he
rises he gathers  men together or because he is always rolling in his
course  about the earth; or from aiolein, of which the meaning
is the same as poikillein , because he variegates the
productions of the earth.

HERMOGENES: But what is selene ?

SOCRATES: That name is rather unfortunate for Anaxagoras.

HERMOGENES: How so?

SOCRATES: The word seems to forestall his recent discovery, that the moon
receives her light from the sun.

HERMOGENES: Why do you say so?

SOCRATES: The two words selas  and phos  have much the same
meaning?

HERMOGENES: Yes.

SOCRATES: This light about the moon is always new  and always old
, if the disciples of Anaxagoras say truly. For the sun in his
revolution always adds new light, and there is the old light of the previous
month.

HERMOGENES: Very true.

SOCRATES: The moon is not unfrequently called selanaia.

HERMOGENES: True.

SOCRATES: And as she has a light which is always old and always new enon neon
aei she may very properly have the name selaenoneoaeia; and this when
hammered into shape becomes selanaia.

HERMOGENES: A real dithyrambic sort of name that, Socrates. But what do you
say of the month and the stars?

SOCRATES: Meis  is called from meiousthai , because
suffering diminution; the name of astra  seems to be derived from
astrape, which is an improvement on anastrope, signifying the upsetting of the
eyes .

HERMOGENES: What do you say of pur  and udor ?

SOCRATES: I am at a loss how to explain pur; either the muse of Euthyphro has
deserted me, or there is some very great difficulty in the word. Please,
however, to note the contrivance which I adopt whenever I am in a difficulty
of this sort.

HERMOGENES: What is it?

SOCRATES: I will tell you; but I should like to know first whether you can
tell me what is the meaning of the pur?

HERMOGENES: Indeed I cannot.

SOCRATES: Shall I tell you what I suspect to be the true explanation of this
and several other words?--My belief is that they are of foreign origin. For
the Hellenes, especially those who were under the dominion of the barbarians,
often borrowed from them.

HERMOGENES: What is the inference?

SOCRATES: Why, you know that any one who seeks to demonstrate the fitness of
these names according to the Hellenic language, and not according to the
language from which the words are derived, is rather likely to be at fault.

HERMOGENES: Yes, certainly.

SOCRATES: Well then, consider whether this pur is not foreign; for the word is
not easily brought into relation with the Hellenic tongue, and the Phrygians
may be observed to have the same word slightly changed, just as they have udor
 and kunes , and many other words.

HERMOGENES: That is true.

SOCRATES: Any violent interpretations of the words should be avoided; for
something to say about them may easily be found. And thus I get rid of pur and
udor. Aer , Hermogenes, may be explained as the element which raises
 things from the earth, or as ever flowing , or because the
flux of the air is wind, and the poets call the winds 'air-blasts,' ;
he who uses the term may mean, so to speak, air-flux , in the sense
of wind-flux ; and because this moving wind may be expressed by
either term he employs the word air . Aither  I
should interpret as aeitheer; this may be correctly said, because this element
is always running in a flux about the air . The
meaning of the word ge  comes out better when in the form of gaia, for
the earth may be truly called 'mother' , as in the language
of Homer  gegaasi means gegennesthai.

HERMOGENES: Good.

SOCRATES: What shall we take next?

HERMOGENES: There are orai , and the two names of the year,
eniautos and etos.

SOCRATES: The orai should be spelt in the old Attic way, if you desire to know
the probable truth about them; they are rightly called the orai because they
divide  the summers and winters and winds and the fruits of the
earth. The words eniautos and etos appear to be the same,--'that which brings
to light the plants and growths of the earth in their turn, and passes them in
review within itself ': this is broken up into two words,
eniautos from en eauto, and etos from etazei, just as the original name of
Zeus was divided into Zena and Dia; and the whole proposition means that his
power of reviewing from within is one, but has two names, two words etos and
eniautos being thus formed out of a single proposition.

HERMOGENES: Indeed, Socrates, you make surprising progress.

SOCRATES: I am run away with.

HERMOGENES: Very true.

SOCRATES: But am not yet at my utmost speed.

HERMOGENES: I should like very much to know, in the next place, how you would
explain the virtues. What principle of correctness is there in those charming
words--wisdom, understanding, justice, and the rest of them?

SOCRATES: That is a tremendous class of names which you are disinterring;
still, as I have put on the lion's skin, I must not be faint of heart; and I
suppose that I must consider the meaning of wisdom  and
understanding , and judgment , and knowledge , and
all those other charming words, as you call them?

HERMOGENES: Surely, we must not leave off until we find out their meaning.

SOCRATES: By the dog of Egypt I have a not bad notion which came into my head
only this moment: I believe that the primeval givers of names were undoubtedly
like too many of our modern philosophers, who, in their search after the
nature of things, are always getting dizzy from constantly going round and
round, and then they imagine that the world is going round and round and
moving in all directions; and this appearance, which arises out of their own
internal condition, they suppose to be a reality of nature; they think that
there is nothing stable or permanent, but only flux and motion, and that the
world is always full of every sort of motion and change. The consideration of
the names which I mentioned has led me into making this reflection.

HERMOGENES: How is that, Socrates?

SOCRATES: Perhaps you did not observe that in the names which have been just
cited, the motion or flux or generation of things is most surely indicated.

HERMOGENES: No, indeed, I never thought of it.

SOCRATES: Take the first of those which you mentioned; clearly that is a name
indicative of motion.

HERMOGENES: What was the name?

SOCRATES: Phronesis , which may signify phoras kai rhou noesis
, or perhaps phoras onesis the blessing of
motion, but is at any rate connected with pheresthai ; gnome
, again, certainly implies the ponderation or consideration
 of generation, for to ponder is the same as to consider; or, if you
would rather, here is noesis, the very word just now mentioned, which is neou
esis ; the word neos implies that the world is always
in process of creation. The giver of the name wanted to express this longing
of the soul, for the original name was neoesis, and not noesis; but eta took
the place of a double epsilon. The word sophrosune is the salvation 
of that wisdom  which we were just now considering. Epioteme
 is akin to this, and indicates that the soul which is good for
anything follows  the motion of things, neither anticipating them nor
falling behind them; wherefore the word should rather be read as epistemene,
inserting epsilon nu. Sunesis  may be regarded in like manner
as a kind of conclusion; the word is derived from sunienai ,
and, like epistasthai , implies the progression of the soul in
company with the nature of things. Sophia  is very dark, and appears
not to be of native growth; the meaning is, touching the motion or stream of
things. You must remember that the poets, when they speak of the commencement
of any rapid motion, often use the word esuthe ; and there was a
famous Lacedaemonian who was named Sous , for by this word the
Lacedaemonians signify rapid motion, and the touching  of motion is
expressed by sophia, for all things are supposed to be in motion. Good
 is the name which is given to the admirable  in nature; for,
although all things move, still there are degrees of motion; some are swifter,
some slower; but there are some things which are admirable for their
swiftness, and this admirable part of nature is called agathon. Dikaiosune
 is clearly dikaiou sunesis ; but the
actual word dikaion is more difficult: men are only agreed to a certain extent
about justice, and then they begin to disagree. For those who suppose all
things to be in motion conceive the greater part of nature to be a mere
receptacle; and they say that there is a penetrating power which passes
through all this, and is the instrument of creation in all, and is the
subtlest and swiftest element; for if it were not the subtlest, and a power
which none can keep out, and also the swiftest, passing by other things as if
they were standing still, it could not penetrate through the moving universe.
And this element, which superintends all things and pierces  all, is
rightly called dikaion; the letter k is only added for the sake of euphony.
Thus far, as I was saying, there is a general agreement about the nature of
justice; but I, Hermogenes, being an enthusiastic disciple, have been told in
a mystery that the justice of which I am speaking is also the cause of the
world: now a cause is that because of which anything is created; and some one
comes and whispers in my ear that justice is rightly so called because
partaking of the nature of the cause, and I begin, after hearing what he has
said, to interrogate him gently: 'Well, my excellent friend,' say I, 'but if
all this be true, I still want to know what is justice.' Thereupon they think
that I ask tiresome questions, and am leaping over the barriers, and have been
already sufficiently answered, and they try to satisfy me with one derivation
after another, and at length they quarrel. For one of them says that justice
is the sun, and that he only is the piercing  and burning 
element which is the guardian of nature. And when I joyfully repeat this
beautiful notion, I am answered by the satirical remark, 'What, is there no
justice in the world when the sun is down?' And when I earnestly beg my
questioner to tell me his own honest opinion, he says, 'Fire in the abstract';
but this is not very intelligible. Another says, 'No, not fire in the
abstract, but the abstraction of heat in the fire.' Another man professes to
laugh at all this, and says, as Anaxagoras says, that justice is mind, for
mind, as they say, has absolute power, and mixes with nothing, and orders all
things, and passes through all things. At last, my friend, I find myself in
far greater perplexity about the nature of justice than I was before I began
to learn. But still I am of opinion that the name, which has led me into this
digression, was given to justice for the reasons which I have mentioned.

HERMOGENES: I think, Socrates, that you are not improvising now; you must have
heard this from some one else.

SOCRATES: And not the rest?

HERMOGENES: Hardly.

SOCRATES: Well, then, let me go on in the hope of making you believe in the
originality of the rest. What remains after justice? I do not think that we
have as yet discussed courage ,--injustice , which is
obviously nothing more than a hindrance to the penetrating principle
, need not be considered. Well, then, the name of andreia seems to
imply a battle;--this battle is in the world of existence, and according to
the doctrine of flux is only the counterflux : if you extract
the delta from andreia, the name at once signifies the thing, and you may
clearly understand that andreia is not the stream opposed to every stream, but
only to that which is contrary to justice, for otherwise courage would not
have been praised. The words arren  and aner  also contain a
similar allusion to the same principle of the upward flux . Gune
 I suspect to be the same word as goun : thelu  appears
to be partly derived from thele , because the teat is like rain, and
makes things flourish .

HERMOGENES: That is surely probable.

SOCRATES: Yes; and the very word thallein  seems to figure the
growth of youth, which is swift and sudden ever. And this is expressed by the
legislator in the name, which is a compound of thein , and allesthai
. Pray observe how I gallop away when I get on smooth ground. There
are a good many names generally thought to be of importance, which have still
to be explained.

HERMOGENES: True.

SOCRATES: There is the meaning of the word techne , for example.

HERMOGENES: Very true.

SOCRATES: That may be identified with echonoe, and expresses the possession of
mind: you have only to take away the tau and insert two omichrons, one between
the chi and nu, and another between the nu and eta.

HERMOGENES: That is a very shabby etymology.

SOCRATES: Yes, my dear friend; but then you know that the original names have
been long ago buried and disguised by people sticking on and stripping off
letters for the sake of euphony, and twisting and bedizening them in all sorts
of ways: and time too may have had a share in the change. Take, for example,
the word katoptron; why is the letter rho inserted? This must surely be the
addition of some one who cares nothing about the truth, but thinks only of
putting the mouth into shape. And the additions are often such that at last no
human being can possibly make out the original meaning of the word. Another
example is the word sphigx, sphiggos, which ought properly to be phigx,
phiggos, and there are other examples.

HERMOGENES: That is quite true, Socrates.

SOCRATES: And yet, if you are permitted to put in and pull out any letters
which you please, names will be too easily made, and any name may be adapted
to any object.

HERMOGENES: True.

SOCRATES: Yes, that is true. And therefore a wise dictator, like yourself,
should observe the laws of moderation and probability.

HERMOGENES: Such is my desire.

SOCRATES: And mine, too, Hermogenes. But do not be too much of a precisian, or
'you will unnerve me of my strength .' When you have allowed me to add
mechane  to techne  I shall be at the top of my bent, for I
conceive mechane to be a sign of great accomplishment--anein; for mekos has
the meaning of greatness, and these two, mekos and anein, make up the word
mechane. But, as I was saying, being now at the top of my bent, I should like
to consider the meaning of the two words arete  and kakia ;
arete I do not as yet understand, but kakia is transparent, and agrees with
the principles which preceded, for all things being in a flux , kakia
is kakos ion ; and this evil motion when existing in the soul has
the general name of kakia, or vice, specially appropriated to it. The meaning
of kakos ienai may be further illustrated by the use of deilia ,
which ought to have come after andreia, but was forgotten, and, as I fear, is
not the only word which has been passed over. Deilia signifies that the soul
is bound with a strong chain , for lian means strength, and therefore
deilia expresses the greatest and strongest bond of the soul; and aporia
 is an evil of the same nature  not, and
poreuesthai to go, like anything else which is an impediment to motion and
movement. Then the word kakia appears to mean kakos ienai, or going badly, or
limping and halting; of which the consequence is, that the soul becomes filled
with vice. And if kakia is the name of this sort of thing, arete will be the
opposite of it, signifying in the first place ease of motion, then that the
stream of the good soul is unimpeded, and has therefore the attribute of ever
flowing without let or hindrance, and is therefore called arete, or, more
correctly, aeireite , and may perhaps have had another form,
airete , indicating that nothing is more eligible than virtue, and
this has been hammered into arete. I daresay that you will deem this to be
another invention of mine, but I think that if the previous word kakia was
right, then arete is also right.

HERMOGENES: But what is the meaning of kakon, which has played so great a part
in your previous discourse?

SOCRATES: That is a very singular word about which I can hardly form an
opinion, and therefore I must have recourse to my ingenious device.

HERMOGENES: What device?

SOCRATES: The device of a foreign origin, which I shall give to this word
also.

HERMOGENES: Very likely you are right; but suppose that we leave these words
and endeavour to see the rationale of kalon and aischron.

SOCRATES: The meaning of aischron is evident, being only aei ischon roes
, and this is in accordance with our former
derivations. For the name-giver was a great enemy to stagnation of all sorts,
and hence he gave the name aeischoroun to that which hindered the flux aei
ischon roun, and that is now beaten together into aischron.

HERMOGENES: But what do you say of kalon?

SOCRATES: That is more obscure; yet the form is only due to the quantity, and
has been changed by altering omicron upsilon into omicron.

HERMOGENES: What do you mean?

SOCRATES: This name appears to denote mind.

HERMOGENES: How so?

SOCRATES: Let me ask you what is the cause why anything has a name; is not the
principle which imposes the name the cause?

HERMOGENES: Certainly.

SOCRATES: And must not this be the mind of Gods, or of men, or of both?

HERMOGENES: Yes.

SOCRATES: Is not mind that which called  things by their names, and
is not mind the beautiful ?

HERMOGENES: That is evident.

SOCRATES: And are not the works of intelligence and mind worthy of praise, and
are not other works worthy of blame?

HERMOGENES: Certainly.

SOCRATES: Physic does the work of a physician, and carpentering does the works
of a carpenter?

HERMOGENES: Exactly.

SOCRATES: And the principle of beauty does the works of beauty?

HERMOGENES: Of course.

SOCRATES: And that principle we affirm to be mind?

HERMOGENES: Very true.

SOCRATES: Then mind is rightly called beauty because she does the works which
we recognize and speak of as the beautiful?

HERMOGENES: That is evident.

SOCRATES: What more names remain to us?

HERMOGENES: There are the words which are connected with agathon and kalon,
such as sumpheron and lusiteloun, ophelimon, kerdaleon, and their opposites.

SOCRATES: The meaning of sumpheron  I think that you may discover
for yourself by the light of the previous examples,--for it is a sister word
to episteme, meaning just the motion  of the soul accompanying the
world, and things which are done upon this principle are called sumphora or
sumpheronta, because they are carried round with the world.

HERMOGENES: That is probable.

SOCRATES: Again, cherdaleon  is called from cherdos , but you
must alter the delta into nu if you want to get at the meaning; for this word
also signifies good, but in another way; he who gave the name intended to
express the power of admixture  and universal penetration in the
good; in forming the word, however, he inserted a delta instead of a nu, and
so made kerdos.

HERMOGENES: Well, but what is lusiteloun ?

SOCRATES: I suppose, Hermogenes, that people do not mean by the profitable the
gainful or that which pays  the retailer, but they use the word in the
sense of swift. You regard the profitable , as that which being
the swiftest thing in existence, allows of no stay in things and no pause or
end of motion, but always, if there begins to be any end, lets things go again
, and makes motion immortal and unceasing: and in this point of view, as
appears to me, the good is happily denominated lusiteloun--being that which
looses  the end  of motion. Ophelimon  is
derived from ophellein, meaning that which creates and increases; this latter
is a common Homeric word, and has a foreign character.

HERMOGENES: And what do you say of their opposites?

SOCRATES: Of such as are mere negatives I hardly think that I need speak.

HERMOGENES: Which are they?

SOCRATES: The words axumphoron , anopheles ,
alusiteles , akerdes .

HERMOGENES: True.

SOCRATES: I would rather take the words blaberon , zemiodes
.

HERMOGENES: Good.

SOCRATES: The word blaberon is that which is said to hinder or harm 
the stream ; blapton is boulomenon aptein ; for
aptein is the same as dein, and dein is always a term of censure; boulomenon
aptein roun  would properly be boulapteroun, and
this, as I imagine, is improved into blaberon.

HERMOGENES: You bring out curious results, Socrates, in the use of names; and
when I hear the word boulapteroun I cannot help imagining that you are making
your mouth into a flute, and puffing away at some prelude to Athene.

SOCRATES: That is the fault of the makers of the name, Hermogenes; not mine.

HERMOGENES: Very true; but what is the derivation of zemiodes?

SOCRATES: What is the meaning of zemiodes?--let me remark, Hermogenes, how
right I was in saying that great changes are made in the meaning of words by
putting in and pulling out letters; even a very slight permutation will
sometimes give an entirely opposite sense; I may instance the word deon, which
occurs to me at the moment, and reminds me of what I was going to say to you,
that the fine fashionable language of modern times has twisted and disguised
and entirely altered the original meaning both of deon, and also of zemiodes,
which in the old language is clearly indicated.

HERMOGENES: What do you mean?

SOCRATES: I will try to explain. You are aware that our forefathers loved the
sounds iota and delta, especially the women, who are most conservative of the
ancient language, but now they change iota into eta or epsilon, and delta into
zeta; this is supposed to increase the grandeur of the sound.

HERMOGENES: How do you mean?

SOCRATES: For example, in very ancient times they called the day either imera
or emera , which is called by us emera .

HERMOGENES: That is true.

SOCRATES: Do you observe that only the ancient form shows the intention of the
giver of the name? of which the reason is, that men long for  and
love the light which comes after the darkness, and is therefore called imera,
from imeros, desire.

HERMOGENES: Clearly.

SOCRATES: But now the name is so travestied that you cannot tell the meaning,
although there are some who imagine the day to be called emera because it
makes things gentle .

HERMOGENES: Such is my view.

SOCRATES: And do you know that the ancients said duogon and not zugon?

HERMOGENES: They did so.

SOCRATES: And zugon  has no meaning,--it ought to be duogon, which word
expresses the binding of two together  for the purpose of
drawing;--this has been changed into zugon, and there are many other examples
of similar changes.

HERMOGENES: There are.

SOCRATES: Proceeding in the same train of thought I may remark that the word
deon  has a meaning which is the opposite of all the other
appellations of good; for deon is here a species of good, and is,
nevertheless, the chain  or hinderer of motion, and therefore own
brother of blaberon.

HERMOGENES: Yes, Socrates; that is quite plain.

SOCRATES: Not if you restore the ancient form, which is more likely to be the
correct one, and read dion instead of deon; if you convert the epsilon into an
iota after the old fashion, this word will then agree with other words meaning
good; for dion, not deon, signifies the good, and is a term of praise; and the
author of names has not contradicted himself, but in all these various
appellations, deon , ophelimon , lusiteloun
, kerdaleon , agathon , sumpheron ,
euporon , the same conception is implied of the ordering or all-
pervading principle which is praised, and the restraining and binding
principle which is censured. And this is further illustrated by the word
zemiodes , which if the zeta is only changed into delta as in the
ancient language, becomes demiodes; and this name, as you will perceive, is
given to that which binds motion .

HERMOGENES: What do you say of edone , lupe , epithumia
, and the like, Socrates?

SOCRATES: I do not think, Hermogenes, that there is any great difficulty about
them--edone is e  onesis, the action which tends to advantage; and the
original form may be supposed to have been eone, but this has been altered by
the insertion of the delta. Lupe appears to be derived from the relaxation
 which the body feels when in sorrow; ania  is the hindrance
of motion ; algedon , if I am not mistaken, is a
foreign word, which is derived from aleinos ; odune  is
called from the putting on  sorrow; in achthedon  'the word
too labours,' as any one may see; chara  is the very expression of the
fluency and diffusion of the soul ; terpsis  is so called from
the pleasure creeping  through the soul, which may be likened to a
breath  and is properly erpnoun, but has been altered by time into
terpnon; eupherosune  and epithumia explain themselves; the
former, which ought to be eupherosune and has been changed euphrosune, is
named, as every one may see, from the soul moving  in harmony with
nature; epithumia is really e epi ton thumon iousa dunamis, the power which
enters into the soul; thumos  is called from the rushing 
and boiling of the soul; imeros  denotes the stream  which most
draws the soul dia ten esin tes roes--because flowing with desire ,
and expresses a longing after things and violent attraction of the soul to
them, and is termed imeros from possessing this power; pothos  is
expressive of the desire of that which is not present but absent, and in
another place ; this is the reason why the name pothos is applied to
things absent, as imeros is to things present; eros  is so called
because flowing in  from without; the stream is not inherent, but is an
influence introduced through the eyes, and from flowing in was called esros
 in the old time when they used omicron for omega, and is called eros,
now that omega is substituted for omicron. But why do you not give me another
word?

HERMOGENES: What do you think of doxa , and that class of words?

SOCRATES: Doxa is either derived from dioxis , and expresses the
march of the soul in the pursuit of knowledge, or from the shooting of a bow
; the latter is more likely, and is confirmed by oiesis ,
which is only oisis , and implies the movement of the soul to the
essential nature of each thing--just as boule  has to do with
shooting ; and boulesthai  combines the notion of aiming and
deliberating--all these words seem to follow doxa, and all involve the idea of
shooting, just as aboulia, absence of counsel, on the other hand, is a mishap,
or missing, or mistaking of the mark, or aim, or proposal, or object.

HERMOGENES: You are quickening your pace now, Socrates.

SOCRATES: Why yes, the end I now dedicate to God, not, however, until I have
explained anagke , which ought to come next, and ekousion the
voluntary. Ekousion is certainly the yielding  and unresisting--the
notion implied is yielding and not opposing, yielding, as I was just now
saying, to that motion which is in accordance with our will; but the necessary
and resistant being contrary to our will, implies error and ignorance; the
idea is taken from walking through a ravine which is impassable, and rugged,
and overgrown, and impedes motion--and this is the derivation of the word
anagkaion  an agke ion, going through a ravine. But while my
strength lasts let us persevere, and I hope that you will persevere with your
questions.

HERMOGENES: Well, then, let me ask about the greatest and noblest, such as
aletheia  and pseudos  and on , not forgetting to
enquire why the word onoma , which is the theme of our discussion, has
this name of onoma.

SOCRATES: You know the word maiesthai ?

HERMOGENES: Yes;--meaning the same as zetein .

SOCRATES: The word onoma seems to be a compressed sentence, signifying on ou
zetema ; as is still more obvious in
onomaston , which states in so many words that real existence is that
for which there is a seeking ; aletheia is also an agglomeration
of theia ale , implying the divine motion of existence;
pseudos  is the opposite of motion; here is another ill name given
by the legislator to stagnation and forced inaction, which he compares to
sleep ; but the original meaning of the word is disguised by the
addition of psi; on and ousia are ion with an iota broken off; this agrees
with the true principle, for being  is also moving , and the same may
be said of not being, which is likewise called not going oukion or ouki on =
ouk ion.

HERMOGENES: You have hammered away at them manfully; but suppose that some one
were to say to you, what is the word ion, and what are reon and doun?--show me
their fitness.

SOCRATES: You mean to say, how should I answer him?

HERMOGENES: Yes.

SOCRATES: One way of giving the appearance of an answer has been already
suggested.

HERMOGENES: What way?

SOCRATES: To say that names which we do not understand are of foreign origin;
and this is very likely the right answer, and something of this kind may be
true of them; but also the original forms of words may have been lost in the
lapse of ages; names have been so twisted in all manner of ways, that I should
not be surprised if the old language when compared with that now in use would
appear to us to be a barbarous tongue.

HERMOGENES: Very likely.

SOCRATES: Yes, very likely. But still the enquiry demands our earnest
attention and we must not flinch. For we should remember, that if a person go
on analysing names into words, and enquiring also into the elements out of
which the words are formed, and keeps on always repeating this process, he who
has to answer him must at last give up the enquiry in despair.

HERMOGENES: Very true.

SOCRATES: And at what point ought he to lose heart and give up the enquiry?
Must he not stop when he comes to the names which are the elements of all
other names and sentences; for these cannot be supposed to be made up of other
names? The word agathon , for example, is, as we were saying, a compound
of agastos  and thoos . And probably thoos is made up of
other elements, and these again of others. But if we take a word which is
incapable of further resolution, then we shall be right in saying that we have
at last reached a primary element, which need not be resolved any further.

HERMOGENES: I believe you to be in the right.

SOCRATES: And suppose the names about which you are now asking should turn out
to be primary elements, must not their truth or law be examined according to
some new method?

HERMOGENES: Very likely.

SOCRATES: Quite so, Hermogenes; all that has preceded would lead to this
conclusion. And if, as I think, the conclusion is true, then I shall again say
to you, come and help me, that I may not fall into some absurdity in stating
the principle of primary names.

HERMOGENES: Let me hear, and I will do my best to assist you.

SOCRATES: I think that you will acknowledge with me, that one principle is
applicable to all names, primary as well as secondary--when they are regarded
simply as names, there is no difference in them.

HERMOGENES: Certainly not.

SOCRATES: All the names that we have been explaining were intended to indicate
the nature of things.

HERMOGENES: Of course.

SOCRATES: And that this is true of the primary quite as much as of the
secondary names, is implied in their being names.

HERMOGENES: Surely.

SOCRATES: But the secondary, as I conceive, derive their significance from the
primary.

HERMOGENES: That is evident.

SOCRATES: Very good; but then how do the primary names which precede analysis
show the natures of things, as far as they can be shown; which they must do,
if they are to be real names? And here I will ask you a question: Suppose that
we had no voice or tongue, and wanted to communicate with one another, should
we not, like the deaf and dumb, make signs with the hands and head and the
rest of the body?

HERMOGENES: There would be no choice, Socrates.

SOCRATES: We should imitate the nature of the thing; the elevation of our
hands to heaven would mean lightness and upwardness; heaviness and
downwardness would be expressed by letting them drop to the ground; if we were
describing the running of a horse, or any other animal, we should make our
bodies and their gestures as like as we could to them.

HERMOGENES: I do not see that we could do anything else.

SOCRATES: We could not; for by bodily imitation only can the body ever express
anything.

HERMOGENES: Very true.

SOCRATES: And when we want to express ourselves, either with the voice, or
tongue, or mouth, the expression is simply their imitation of that which we
want to express.

HERMOGENES: It must be so, I think.

SOCRATES: Then a name is a vocal imitation of that which the vocal imitator
names or imitates?

HERMOGENES: I think so.

SOCRATES: Nay, my friend, I am disposed to think that we have not reached the
truth as yet.

HERMOGENES: Why not?

SOCRATES: Because if we have we shall be obliged to admit that the people who
imitate sheep, or cocks, or other animals, name that which they imitate.

HERMOGENES: Quite true.

SOCRATES: Then could I have been right in what I was saying?

HERMOGENES: In my opinion, no. But I wish that you would tell me, Socrates,
what sort of an imitation is a name?

SOCRATES: In the first place, I should reply, not a musical imitation,
although that is also vocal; nor, again, an imitation of what music imitates;
these, in my judgment, would not be naming. Let me put the matter as follows:
All objects have sound and figure, and many have colour?

HERMOGENES: Certainly.

SOCRATES: But the art of naming appears not to be concerned with imitations of
this kind; the arts which have to do with them are music and drawing?

HERMOGENES: True.

SOCRATES: Again, is there not an essence of each thing, just as there is a
colour, or sound? And is there not an essence of colour and sound as well as
of anything else which may be said to have an essence?

HERMOGENES: I should think so.

SOCRATES: Well, and if any one could express the essence of each thing in
letters and syllables, would he not express the nature of each thing?

HERMOGENES: Quite so.

SOCRATES: The musician and the painter were the two names which you gave to
the two other imitators. What will this imitator be called?

HERMOGENES: I imagine, Socrates, that he must be the namer, or name-giver, of
whom we are in search.

SOCRATES: If this is true, then I think that we are in a condition to consider
the names ron , ienai , schesis , about which you
were asking; and we may see whether the namer has grasped the nature of them
in letters and syllables in such a manner as to imitate the essence or not.

HERMOGENES: Very good.

SOCRATES: But are these the only primary names, or are there others?

HERMOGENES: There must be others.

SOCRATES: So I should expect. But how shall we further analyse them, and where
does the imitator begin? Imitation of the essence is made by syllables and
letters; ought we not, therefore, first to separate the letters, just as those
who are beginning rhythm first distinguish the powers of elementary, and then
of compound sounds, and when they have done so, but not before, they proceed
to the consideration of rhythms?

HERMOGENES: Yes.

SOCRATES: Must we not begin in the same way with letters; first separating the
vowels, and then the consonants and mutes letters which are neither vowels
nor semivowels, into classes, according to the received distinctions of the
learned; also the semivowels, which are neither vowels, nor yet mutes; and
distinguishing into classes the vowels themselves? And when we have perfected
the classification of things, we shall give them names, and see whether, as in
the case of letters, there are any classes to which they may be all referred
; and hence we shall see their natures, and see, too, whether
they have in them classes as there are in the letters; and when we have well
considered all this, we shall know how to apply them to what they resemble--
whether one letter is used to denote one thing, or whether there is to be an
admixture of several of them; just, as in painting, the painter who wants to
depict anything sometimes uses purple only, or any other colour, and sometimes
mixes up several colours, as his method is when he has to paint flesh colour
or anything of that kind--he uses his colours as his figures appear to require
them; and so, too, we shall apply letters to the expression of objects, either
single letters when required, or several letters; and so we shall form
syllables, as they are called, and from syllables make nouns and verbs; and
thus, at last, from the combinations of nouns and verbs arrive at language,
large and fair and whole; and as the painter made a figure, even so shall we
make speech by the art of the namer or the rhetorician, or by some other art.
Not that I am literally speaking of ourselves, but I was carried away--meaning
to say that this was the way in which  the ancients formed
language, and what they put together we must take to pieces in like manner, if
we are to attain a scientific view of the whole subject, and we must see
whether the primary, and also whether the secondary elements are rightly given
or not, for if they are not, the composition of them, my dear Hermogenes, will
be a sorry piece of work, and in the wrong direction.

HERMOGENES: That, Socrates, I can quite believe.

SOCRATES: Well, but do you suppose that you will be able to analyse them in
this way? for I am certain that I should not.

HERMOGENES: Much less am I likely to be able.

SOCRATES: Shall we leave them, then? or shall we seek to discover, if we can,
something about them, according to the measure of our ability, saying by way
of preface, as I said before of the Gods, that of the truth about them we know
nothing, and do but entertain human notions of them. And in this present
enquiry, let us say to ourselves, before we proceed, that the higher method is
the one which we or others who would analyse language to any good purpose must
follow; but under the circumstances, as men say, we must do as well as we can.
What do you think?

HERMOGENES: I very much approve.

SOCRATES: That objects should be imitated in letters and syllables, and so
find expression, may appear ridiculous, Hermogenes, but it cannot be avoided--
there is no better principle to which we can look for the truth of first
names. Deprived of this, we must have recourse to divine help, like the tragic
poets, who in any perplexity have their gods waiting in the air; and must get
out of our difficulty in like fashion, by saying that 'the Gods gave the first
names, and therefore they are right.' This will be the best contrivance, or
perhaps that other notion may be even better still, of deriving them from some
barbarous people, for the barbarians are older than we are; or we may say that
antiquity has cast a veil over them, which is the same sort of excuse as the
last; for all these are not reasons but only ingenious excuses for having no
reasons concerning the truth of words. And yet any sort of ignorance of first
or primitive names involves an ignorance of secondary words; for they can only
be explained by the primary. Clearly then the professor of languages should be
able to give a very lucid explanation of first names, or let him be assured he
will only talk nonsense about the rest. Do you not suppose this to be true?

HERMOGENES: Certainly, Socrates.

SOCRATES: My first notions of original names are truly wild and ridiculous,
though I have no objection to impart them to you if you desire, and I hope
that you will communicate to me in return anything better which you may have.

HERMOGENES: Fear not; I will do my best.

SOCRATES: In the first place, the letter rho appears to me to be the general
instrument expressing all motion . But I have not yet explained the
meaning of this latter word, which is just iesis ; for the letter eta
was not in use among the ancients, who only employed epsilon; and the root is
kiein, which is a foreign form, the same as ienai. And the old word kinesis
will be correctly given as iesis in corresponding modern letters. Assuming
this foreign root kiein, and allowing for the change of the eta and the
insertion of the nu, we have kinesis, which should have been kieinsis or
eisis; and stasis is the negative of ienai , and has been improved
into stasis. Now the letter rho, as I was saying, appeared to the imposer of
names an excellent instrument for the expression of motion; and he frequently
uses the letter for this purpose: for example, in the actual words rein and
roe he represents motion by rho; also in the words tromos , trachus
; and again, in words such as krouein , thrauein ,
ereikein , thruptein , kermatixein , rumbein :
of all these sorts of movements he generally finds an expression in the letter
R, because, as I imagine, he had observed that the tongue was most agitated
and least at rest in the pronunciation of this letter, which he therefore used
in order to express motion, just as by the letter iota he expresses the subtle
elements which pass through all things. This is why he uses the letter iota as
imitative of motion, ienai, iesthai. And there is another class of letters,
phi, psi, sigma, and xi, of which the pronunciation is accompanied by great
expenditure of breath; these are used in the imitation of such notions as
psuchron , xeon , seiesthai, , seismos
, and are always introduced by the giver of names when he wants to
imitate what is phusodes . He seems to have thought that the closing
and pressure of the tongue in the utterance of delta and tau was expressive of
binding and rest in a place: he further observed the liquid movement of
lambda, in the pronunciation of which the tongue slips, and in this he found
the expression of smoothness, as in leios , and in the word oliothanein
 itself, liparon , in the word kollodes , and the like:
the heavier sound of gamma detained the slipping tongue, and the union of the
two gave the notion of a glutinous clammy nature, as in glischros, glukus,
gloiodes. The nu he observed to be sounded from within, and therefore to have
a notion of inwardness; hence he introduced the sound in endos and entos:
alpha he assigned to the expression of size, and nu of length, because they
are great letters: omicron was the sign of roundness, and therefore there is
plenty of omicron mixed up in the word goggulon . Thus did the
legislator, reducing all things into letters and syllables, and impressing on
them names and signs, and out of them by imitation compounding other signs.
That is my view, Hermogenes, of the truth of names; but I should like to hear
what Cratylus has more to say.

HERMOGENES: But, Socrates, as I was telling you before, Cratylus mystifies me;
he says that there is a fitness of names, but he never explains what is this
fitness, so that I cannot tell whether his obscurity is intended or not. Tell
me now, Cratylus, here in the presence of Socrates, do you agree in what
Socrates has been saying about names, or have you something better of your
own? and if you have, tell me what your view is, and then you will either
learn of Socrates, or Socrates and I will learn of you.

CRATYLUS: Well, but surely, Hermogenes, you do not suppose that you can learn,
or I explain, any subject of importance all in a moment; at any rate, not such
a subject as language, which is, perhaps, the very greatest of all.

HERMOGENES: No, indeed; but, as Hesiod says, and I agree with him, 'to add
little to little' is worth while. And, therefore, if you think that you can
add anything at all, however small, to our knowledge, take a little trouble
and oblige Socrates, and me too, who certainly have a claim upon you.

SOCRATES: I am by no means positive, Cratylus, in the view which Hermogenes
and myself have worked out; and therefore do not hesitate to say what you
think, which if it be better than my own view I shall gladly accept. And I
should not be at all surprized to find that you have found some better notion.
For you have evidently reflected on these matters and have had teachers, and
if you have really a better theory of the truth of names, you may count me in
the number of your disciples.

CRATYLUS: You are right, Socrates, in saying that I have made a study of these
matters, and I might possibly convert you into a disciple. But I fear that the
opposite is more probable, and I already find myself moved to say to you what
Achilles in the 'Prayers' says to Ajax,--

'Illustrious Ajax, son of Telamon, lord of the people, You appear to have
spoken in all things much to my mind.'

And you, Socrates, appear to me to be an oracle, and to give answers much to
my mind, whether you are inspired by Euthyphro, or whether some Muse may have
long been an inhabitant of your breast, unconsciously to yourself.

SOCRATES: Excellent Cratylus, I have long been wondering at my own wisdom; I
cannot trust myself. And I think that I ought to stop and ask myself What am I
saying? for there is nothing worse than self-deception--when the deceiver is
always at home and always with you--it is quite terrible, and therefore I
ought often to retrace my steps and endeavour to 'look fore and aft,' in the
words of the aforesaid Homer. And now let me see; where are we? Have we not
been saying that the correct name indicates the nature of the thing:--has this
proposition been sufficiently proven?

CRATYLUS: Yes, Socrates, what you say, as I am disposed to think, is quite
true.

SOCRATES: Names, then, are given in order to instruct?

CRATYLUS: Certainly.

SOCRATES: And naming is an art, and has artificers?

CRATYLUS: Yes.

SOCRATES: And who are they?

CRATYLUS: The legislators, of whom you spoke at first.

SOCRATES: And does this art grow up among men like other arts? Let me explain
what I mean: of painters, some are better and some worse?

CRATYLUS: Yes.

SOCRATES: The better painters execute their works, I mean their figures,
better, and the worse execute them worse; and of builders also, the better
sort build fairer houses, and the worse build them worse.

CRATYLUS: True.

SOCRATES: And among legislators, there are some who do their work better and
some worse?

CRATYLUS: No; there I do not agree with you.

SOCRATES: Then you do not think that some laws are better and others worse?

CRATYLUS: No, indeed.

SOCRATES: Or that one name is better than another?

CRATYLUS: Certainly not.

SOCRATES: Then all names are rightly imposed?

CRATYLUS: Yes, if they are names at all.

SOCRATES: Well, what do you say to the name of our friend Hermogenes, which
was mentioned before:--assuming that he has nothing of the nature of Hermes in
him, shall we say that this is a wrong name, or not his name at all?

CRATYLUS: I should reply that Hermogenes is not his name at all, but only
appears to be his, and is really the name of somebody else, who has the nature
which corresponds to it.

SOCRATES: And if a man were to call him Hermogenes, would he not be even
speaking falsely? For there may be a doubt whether you can call him
Hermogenes, if he is not.

CRATYLUS: What do you mean?

SOCRATES: Are you maintaining that falsehood is impossible? For if this is
your meaning I should answer, that there have been plenty of liars in all
ages.

CRATYLUS: Why, Socrates, how can a man say that which is not?--say something
and yet say nothing? For is not falsehood saying the thing which is not?

SOCRATES: Your argument, friend, is too subtle for a man of my age. But I
should like to know whether you are one of those philosophers who think that
falsehood may be spoken but not said?

CRATYLUS: Neither spoken nor said.

SOCRATES: Nor uttered nor addressed? For example: If a person, saluting you in
a foreign country, were to take your hand and say: 'Hail, Athenian stranger,
Hermogenes, son of Smicrion'--these words, whether spoken, said, uttered, or
addressed, would have no application to you but only to our friend Hermogenes,
or perhaps to nobody at all?

CRATYLUS: In my opinion, Socrates, the speaker would only be talking nonsense.

SOCRATES: Well, but that will be quite enough for me, if you will tell me
whether the nonsense would be true or false, or partly true and partly
false:--which is all that I want to know.

CRATYLUS: I should say that he would be putting himself in motion to no
purpose; and that his words would be an unmeaning sound like the noise of
hammering at a brazen pot.

SOCRATES: But let us see, Cratylus, whether we cannot find a meeting-point,
for you would admit that the name is not the same with the thing named?

CRATYLUS: I should.

SOCRATES: And would you further acknowledge that the name is an imitation of
the thing?

CRATYLUS: Certainly.

SOCRATES: And you would say that pictures are also imitations of things, but
in another way?

CRATYLUS: Yes.

SOCRATES: I believe you may be right, but I do not rightly understand you.
Please to say, then, whether both sorts of imitation I mean both pictures or
words are not equally attributable and applicable to the things of which they
are the imitation.

CRATYLUS: They are.

SOCRATES: First look at the matter thus: you may attribute the likeness of the
man to the man, and of the woman to the woman; and so on?

CRATYLUS: Certainly.

SOCRATES: And conversely you may attribute the likeness of the man to the
woman, and of the woman to the man?

CRATYLUS: Very true.

SOCRATES: And are both modes of assigning them right, or only the first?

CRATYLUS: Only the first.

SOCRATES: That is to say, the mode of assignment which attributes to each that
which belongs to them and is like them?

CRATYLUS: That is my view.

SOCRATES: Now then, as I am desirous that we being friends should have a good
understanding about the argument, let me state my view to you: the first mode
of assignment, whether applied to figures or to names, I call right, and when
applied to names only, true as well as right; and the other mode of giving and
assigning the name which is unlike, I call wrong, and in the case of names,
false as well as wrong.

CRATYLUS: That may be true, Socrates, in the case of pictures; they may be
wrongly assigned; but not in the case of names--they must be always right.

SOCRATES: Why, what is the difference? May I not go to a man and say to him,
'This is your picture,' showing him his own likeness, or perhaps the likeness
of a woman; and when I say 'show,' I mean bring before the sense of sight.

CRATYLUS: Certainly.

SOCRATES: And may I not go to him again, and say, 'This is your name'?--for
the name, like the picture, is an imitation. May I not say to him--'This is
your name'? and may I not then bring to his sense of hearing the imitation of
himself, when I say, 'This is a man'; or of a female of the human species,
when I say, 'This is a woman,' as the case may be? Is not all that quite
possible?

CRATYLUS: I would fain agree with you, Socrates; and therefore I say, Granted.

SOCRATES: That is very good of you, if I am right, which need hardly be
disputed at present. But if I can assign names as well as pictures to objects,
the right assignment of them we may call truth, and the wrong assignment of
them falsehood. Now if there be such a wrong assignment of names, there may
also be a wrong or inappropriate assignment of verbs; and if of names and
verbs then of the sentences, which are made up of them. What do you say,
Cratylus?

CRATYLUS: I agree; and think that what you say is very true.

SOCRATES: And further, primitive nouns may be compared to pictures, and in
pictures you may either give all the appropriate colours and figures, or you
may not give them all--some may be wanting; or there may be too many or too
much of them--may there not?

CRATYLUS: Very true.

SOCRATES: And he who gives all gives a perfect picture or figure; and he who
takes away or adds also gives a picture or figure, but not a good one.

CRATYLUS: Yes.

SOCRATES: In like manner, he who by syllables and letters imitates the nature
of things, if he gives all that is appropriate will produce a good image, or
in other words a name; but if he subtracts or perhaps adds a little, he will
make an image but not a good one; whence I infer that some names are well and
others ill made.

CRATYLUS: That is true.

SOCRATES: Then the artist of names may be sometimes good, or he may be bad?

CRATYLUS: Yes.

SOCRATES: And this artist of names is called the legislator?

CRATYLUS: Yes.

SOCRATES: Then like other artists the legislator may be good or he may be bad;
it must surely be so if our former admissions hold good?

CRATYLUS: Very true, Socrates; but the case of language, you see, is
different; for when by the help of grammar we assign the letters alpha or
beta, or any other letters to a certain name, then, if we add, or subtract, or
misplace a letter, the name which is written is not only written wrongly, but
not written at all; and in any of these cases becomes other than a name.

SOCRATES: But I doubt whether your view is altogether correct, Cratylus.

CRATYLUS: How so?

SOCRATES: I believe that what you say may be true about numbers, which must be
just what they are, or not be at all; for example, the number ten at once
becomes other than ten if a unit be added or subtracted, and so of any other
number: but this does not apply to that which is qualitative or to anything
which is represented under an image. I should say rather that the image, if
expressing in every point the entire reality, would no longer be an image. Let
us suppose the existence of two objects: one of them shall be Cratylus, and
the other the image of Cratylus; and we will suppose, further, that some God
makes not only a representation such as a painter would make of your outward
form and colour, but also creates an inward organization like yours, having
the same warmth and softness; and into this infuses motion, and soul, and
mind, such as you have, and in a word copies all your qualities, and places
them by you in another form; would you say that this was Cratylus and the
image of Cratylus, or that there were two Cratyluses?

CRATYLUS: I should say that there were two Cratyluses.

SOCRATES: Then you see, my friend, that we must find some other principle of
truth in images, and also in names; and not insist that an image is no longer
an image when something is added or subtracted. Do you not perceive that
images are very far from having qualities which are the exact counterpart of
the realities which they represent?

CRATYLUS: Yes, I see.

SOCRATES: But then how ridiculous would be the effect of names on things, if
they were exactly the same with them! For they would be the doubles of them,
and no one would be able to determine which were the names and which were the
realities.

CRATYLUS: Quite true.

SOCRATES: Then fear not, but have the courage to admit that one name may be
correctly and another incorrectly given; and do not insist that the name shall
be exactly the same with the thing; but allow the occasional substitution of a
wrong letter, and if of a letter also of a noun in a sentence, and if of a
noun in a sentence also of a sentence which is not appropriate to the matter,
and acknowledge that the thing may be named, and described, so long as the
general character of the thing which you are describing is retained; and this,
as you will remember, was remarked by Hermogenes and myself in the particular
instance of the names of the letters.

CRATYLUS: Yes, I remember.

SOCRATES: Good; and when the general character is preserved, even if some of
the proper letters are wanting, still the thing is signified;--well, if all
the letters are given; not well, when only a few of them are given. I think
that we had better admit this, lest we be punished like travellers in Aegina
who wander about the street late at night: and be likewise told by truth
herself that we have arrived too late; or if not, you must find out some new
notion of correctness of names, and no longer maintain that a name is the
expression of a thing in letters or syllables; for if you say both, you will
be inconsistent with yourself.

CRATYLUS: I quite acknowledge, Socrates, what you say to be very reasonable.

SOCRATES: Then as we are agreed thus far, let us ask ourselves whether a name
rightly imposed ought not to have the proper letters.

CRATYLUS: Yes.

SOCRATES: And the proper letters are those which are like the things?

CRATYLUS: Yes.

SOCRATES: Enough then of names which are rightly given. And in names which are
incorrectly given, the greater part may be supposed to be made up of proper
and similar letters, or there would be no likeness; but there will be likewise
a part which is improper and spoils the beauty and formation of the word: you
would admit that?

CRATYLUS: There would be no use, Socrates, in my quarrelling with you, since I
cannot be satisfied that a name which is incorrectly given is a name at all.

SOCRATES: Do you admit a name to be the representation of a thing?

CRATYLUS: Yes, I do.

SOCRATES: But do you not allow that some nouns are primitive, and some
derived?

CRATYLUS: Yes, I do.

SOCRATES: Then if you admit that primitive or first nouns are representations
of things, is there any better way of framing representations than by
assimilating them to the objects as much as you can; or do you prefer the
notion of Hermogenes and of many others, who say that names are conventional,
and have a meaning to those who have agreed about them, and who have previous
knowledge of the things intended by them, and that convention is the only
principle; and whether you abide by our present convention, or make a new and
opposite one, according to which you call small great and great small--that,
they would say, makes no difference, if you are only agreed. Which of these
two notions do you prefer?

CRATYLUS: Representation by likeness, Socrates, is infinitely better than
representation by any chance sign.

SOCRATES: Very good: but if the name is to be like the thing, the letters out
of which the first names are composed must also be like things. Returning to
the image of the picture, I would ask, How could any one ever compose a
picture which would be like anything at all, if there were not pigments in
nature which resembled the things imitated, and out of which the picture is
composed?

CRATYLUS: Impossible.

SOCRATES: No more could names ever resemble any actually existing thing,
unless the original elements of which they are compounded bore some degree of
resemblance to the objects of which the names are the imitation: And the
original elements are letters?

CRATYLUS: Yes.

SOCRATES: Let me now invite you to consider what Hermogenes and I were saying
about sounds. Do you agree with me that the letter rho is expressive of
rapidity, motion, and hardness? Were we right or wrong in saying so?

CRATYLUS: I should say that you were right.

SOCRATES: And that lamda was expressive of smoothness, and softness, and the
like?

CRATYLUS: There again you were right.

SOCRATES: And yet, as you are aware, that which is called by us sklerotes, is
by the Eretrians called skleroter.

CRATYLUS: Very true.

SOCRATES: But are the letters rho and sigma equivalents; and is there the same
significance to them in the termination rho, which there is to us in sigma, or
is there no significance to one of us?

CRATYLUS: Nay, surely there is a significance to both of us.

SOCRATES: In as far as they are like, or in as far as they are unlike?

CRATYLUS: In as far as they are like.

SOCRATES: Are they altogether alike?

CRATYLUS: Yes; for the purpose of expressing motion.

SOCRATES: And what do you say of the insertion of the lamda? for that is
expressive not of hardness but of softness.

CRATYLUS: Why, perhaps the letter lamda is wrongly inserted, Socrates, and
should be altered into rho, as you were saying to Hermogenes and in my opinion
rightly, when you spoke of adding and subtracting letters upon occasion.

SOCRATES: Good. But still the word is intelligible to both of us; when I say
skleros , you know what I mean.

CRATYLUS: Yes, my dear friend, and the explanation of that is custom.

SOCRATES: And what is custom but convention? I utter a sound which I
understand, and you know that I understand the meaning of the sound: this is
what you are saying?

CRATYLUS: Yes.

SOCRATES: And if when I speak you know my meaning, there is an indication
given by me to you?

CRATYLUS: Yes.

SOCRATES: This indication of my meaning may proceed from unlike as well as
from like, for example in the lamda of sklerotes. But if this is true, then
you have made a convention with yourself, and the correctness of a name turns
out to be convention, since letters which are unlike are indicative equally
with those which are like, if they are sanctioned by custom and convention.
And even supposing that you distinguish custom from convention ever so much,
still you must say that the signification of words is given by custom and not
by likeness, for custom may indicate by the unlike as well as by the like. But
as we are agreed thus far, Cratylus for I shall assume that your silence
gives consent, then custom and convention must be supposed to contribute to
the indication of our thoughts; for suppose we take the instance of number,
how can you ever imagine, my good friend, that you will find names resembling
every individual number, unless you allow that which you term convention and
agreement to have authority in determining the correctness of names? I quite
agree with you that words should as far as possible resemble things; but I
fear that this dragging in of resemblance, as Hermogenes says, is a shabby
thing, which has to be supplemented by the mechanical aid of convention with a
view to correctness; for I believe that if we could always, or almost always,
use likenesses, which are perfectly appropriate, this would be the most
perfect state of language; as the opposite is the most imperfect. But let me
ask you, what is the force of names, and what is the use of them?

CRATYLUS: The use of names, Socrates, as I should imagine, is to inform: the
simple truth is, that he who knows names knows also the things which are
expressed by them.

SOCRATES: I suppose you mean to say, Cratylus, that as the name is, so also is
the thing; and that he who knows the one will also know the other, because
they are similars, and all similars fall under the same art or science; and
therefore you would say that he who knows names will also know things.

CRATYLUS: That is precisely what I mean.

SOCRATES: But let us consider what is the nature of this information about
things which, according to you, is given us by names. Is it the best sort of
information? or is there any other? What do you say?

CRATYLUS: I believe that to be both the only and the best sort of information
about them; there can be no other.

SOCRATES: But do you believe that in the discovery of them, he who discovers
the names discovers also the things; or is this only the method of
instruction, and is there some other method of enquiry and discovery.

CRATYLUS: I certainly believe that the methods of enquiry and discovery are of
the same nature as instruction.

SOCRATES: Well, but do you not see, Cratylus, that he who follows names in the
search after things, and analyses their meaning, is in great danger of being
deceived?

CRATYLUS: How so?

SOCRATES: Why clearly he who first gave names gave them according to his
conception of the things which they signified--did he not?

CRATYLUS: True.

SOCRATES: And if his conception was erroneous, and he gave names according to
his conception, in what position shall we who are his followers find
ourselves? Shall we not be deceived by him?

CRATYLUS: But, Socrates, am I not right in thinking that he must surely have
known; or else, as I was saying, his names would not be names at all? And you
have a clear proof that he has not missed the truth, and the proof is--that he
is perfectly consistent. Did you ever observe in speaking that all the words
which you utter have a common character and purpose?

SOCRATES: But that, friend Cratylus, is no answer. For if he did begin in
error, he may have forced the remainder into agreement with the original error
and with himself; there would be nothing strange in this, any more than in
geometrical diagrams, which have often a slight and invisible flaw in the
first part of the process, and are consistently mistaken in the long
deductions which follow. And this is the reason why every man should expend
his chief thought and attention on the consideration of his first
principles:--are they or are they not rightly laid down? and when he has duly
sifted them, all the rest will follow. Now I should be astonished to find that
names are really consistent. And here let us revert to our former discussion:
Were we not saying that all things are in motion and progress and flux, and
that this idea of motion is expressed by names? Do you not conceive that to be
the meaning of them?

CRATYLUS: Yes; that is assuredly their meaning, and the true meaning.

SOCRATES: Let us revert to episteme  and observe how ambiguous this
word is, seeming rather to signify stopping the soul at things than going
round with them; and therefore we should leave the beginning as at present,
and not reject the epsilon, but make an insertion of an iota instead of an
epsilon . Take another example: bebaion  is
clearly the expression of station and position, and not of motion. Again, the
word istoria  bears upon the face of it the stopping  of the
stream; and the word piston  certainly indicates cessation of
motion; then, again, mneme , as any one may see, expresses rest in the
soul, and not motion. Moreover, words such as amartia and sumphora, which have
a bad sense, viewed in the light of their etymologies will be the same as
sunesis and episteme and other words which have a good sense compare
omartein, sunienai, epesthai, sumpheresthai; and much the same may be said of
amathia and akolasia, for amathia may be explained as e ama theo iontos
poreia, and akolasia as e akolouthia tois pragmasin. Thus the names which in
these instances we find to have the worst sense, will turn out to be framed on
the same principle as those which have the best. And any one I believe who
would take the trouble might find many other examples in which the giver of
names indicates, not that things are in motion or progress, but that they are
at rest; which is the opposite of motion.

CRATYLUS: Yes, Socrates, but observe; the greater number express motion.

SOCRATES: What of that, Cratylus? Are we to count them like votes? and is
correctness of names the voice of the majority? Are we to say of whichever
sort there are most, those are the true ones?

CRATYLUS: No; that is not reasonable.

SOCRATES: Certainly not. But let us have done with this question and proceed
to another, about which I should like to know whether you think with me. Were
we not lately acknowledging that the first givers of names in states, both
Hellenic and barbarous, were the legislators, and that the art which gave
names was the art of the legislator?

CRATYLUS: Quite true.

SOCRATES: Tell me, then, did the first legislators, who were the givers of the
first names, know or not know the things which they named?

CRATYLUS: They must have known, Socrates.

SOCRATES: Why, yes, friend Cratylus, they could hardly have been ignorant.

CRATYLUS: I should say not.

SOCRATES: Let us return to the point from which we digressed. You were saying,
if you remember, that he who gave names must have known the things which he
named; are you still of that opinion?

CRATYLUS: I am.

SOCRATES: And would you say that the giver of the first names had also a
knowledge of the things which he named?

CRATYLUS: I should.

SOCRATES: But how could he have learned or discovered things from names if the
primitive names were not yet given? For, if we are correct in our view, the
only way of learning and discovering things, is either to discover names for
ourselves or to learn them from others.

CRATYLUS: I think that there is a good deal in what you say, Socrates.

SOCRATES: But if things are only to be known through names, how can we suppose
that the givers of names had knowledge, or were legislators before there were
names at all, and therefore before they could have known them?

CRATYLUS: I believe, Socrates, the true account of the matter to be, that a
power more than human gave things their first names, and that the names which
are thus given are necessarily their true names.

SOCRATES: Then how came the giver of the names, if he was an inspired being or
God, to contradict himself? For were we not saying just now that he made some
names expressive of rest and others of motion? Were we mistaken?

CRATYLUS: But I suppose one of the two not to be names at all.

SOCRATES: And which, then, did he make, my good friend; those which are
expressive of rest, or those which are expressive of motion? This is a point
which, as I said before, cannot be determined by counting them.

CRATYLUS: No; not in that way, Socrates.

SOCRATES: But if this is a battle of names, some of them asserting that they
are like the truth, others contending that THEY are, how or by what criterion
are we to decide between them? For there are no other names to which appeal
can be made, but obviously recourse must be had to another standard which,
without employing names, will make clear which of the two are right; and this
must be a standard which shows the truth of things.

CRATYLUS: I agree.

SOCRATES: But if that is true, Cratylus, then I suppose that things may be
known without names?

CRATYLUS: Clearly.

SOCRATES: But how would you expect to know them? What other way can there be
of knowing them, except the true and natural way, through their affinities,
when they are akin to each other, and through themselves? For that which is
other and different from them must signify something other and different from
them.

CRATYLUS: What you are saying is, I think, true.

SOCRATES: Well, but reflect; have we not several times acknowledged that names
rightly given are the likenesses and images of the things which they name?

CRATYLUS: Yes.

SOCRATES: Let us suppose that to any extent you please you can learn things
through the medium of names, and suppose also that you can learn them from the
things themselves--which is likely to be the nobler and clearer way; to learn
of the image, whether the image and the truth of which the image is the
expression have been rightly conceived, or to learn of the truth whether the
truth and the image of it have been duly executed?

CRATYLUS: I should say that we must learn of the truth.

SOCRATES: How real existence is to be studied or discovered is, I suspect,
beyond you and me. But we may admit so much, that the knowledge of things is
not to be derived from names. No; they must be studied and investigated in
themselves.

CRATYLUS: Clearly, Socrates.

SOCRATES: There is another point. I should not like us to be imposed upon by
the appearance of such a multitude of names, all tending in the same
direction. I myself do not deny that the givers of names did really give them
under the idea that all things were in motion and flux; which was their
sincere but, I think, mistaken opinion. And having fallen into a kind of
whirlpool themselves, they are carried round, and want to drag us in after
them. There is a matter, master Cratylus, about which I often dream, and
should like to ask your opinion: Tell me, whether there is or is not any
absolute beauty or good, or any other absolute existence?

CRATYLUS: Certainly, Socrates, I think so.

SOCRATES: Then let us seek the true beauty: not asking whether a face is fair,
or anything of that sort, for all such things appear to be in a flux; but let
us ask whether the true beauty is not always beautiful.

CRATYLUS: Certainly.

SOCRATES: And can we rightly speak of a beauty which is always passing away,
and is first this and then that; must not the same thing be born and retire
and vanish while the word is in our mouths?

CRATYLUS: Undoubtedly.

SOCRATES: Then how can that be a real thing which is never in the same state?
for obviously things which are the same cannot change while they remain the
same; and if they are always the same and in the same state, and never depart
from their original form, they can never change or be moved.

CRATYLUS: Certainly they cannot.

SOCRATES: Nor yet can they be known by any one; for at the moment that the
observer approaches, then they become other and of another nature, so that you
cannot get any further in knowing their nature or state, for you cannot know
that which has no state.

CRATYLUS: True.

SOCRATES: Nor can we reasonably say, Cratylus, that there is knowledge at all,
if everything is in a state of transition and there is nothing abiding; for
knowledge too cannot continue to be knowledge unless continuing always to
abide and exist. But if the very nature of knowledge changes, at the time when
the change occurs there will be no knowledge; and if the transition is always
going on, there will always be no knowledge, and, according to this view,
there will be no one to know and nothing to be known: but if that which knows
and that which is known exists ever, and the beautiful and the good and every
other thing also exist, then I do not think that they can resemble a process
or flux, as we were just now supposing. Whether there is this eternal nature
in things, or whether the truth is what Heracleitus and his followers and many
others say, is a question hard to determine; and no man of sense will like to
put himself or the education of his mind in the power of names: neither will
he so far trust names or the givers of names as to be confident in any
knowledge which condemns himself and other existences to an unhealthy state of
unreality; he will not believe that all things leak like a pot, or imagine
that the world is a man who has a running at the nose. This may be true,
Cratylus, but is also very likely to be untrue; and therefore I would not have
you be too easily persuaded of it. Reflect well and like a man, and do not
easily accept such a doctrine; for you are young and of an age to learn. And
when you have found the truth, come and tell me.

CRATYLUS: I will do as you say, though I can assure you, Socrates, that I have
been considering the matter already, and the result of a great deal of trouble
and consideration is that I incline to Heracleitus.

SOCRATES: Then, another day, my friend, when you come back, you shall give me
a lesson; but at present, go into the country, as you are intending, and
Hermogenes shall set you on your way.

CRATYLUS: Very good, Socrates; I hope, however, that you will continue to
think about these things yourself.